Hawaii, session 2025, GM1345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may
be cited as the General Appropriations Act of 2025.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS. Unless otherwise clear from the
context, as used in this Act:
"Capital project number" means the official number of the
capital project, as assigned by the responsible organization.
"Expending agency" means the executive department,
independent commission, bureau, office, board, or other
establishment of the state government (other than the
legislature. Office of Hawaiian Affairs, and judiciary), the
political subdivisions of the State, or any quasi-public
institution supported in whole or in part by state funds, which
is authorized to expend specified appropriations made by this
Act.
Abbreviations where used to denote the expending agency
shall mean the following:
HB300 CDl FIN
iiniMiiun

Page 2
H.B. NO.
^1
C.D. 1
AGR Department of Agriculture
AGS Department of Accounting and General Services
ATG Department of the Attorney General
BED Department of Business, Economic Development and
Tourism
BUF Department of Budget and Finance
CCA Department of Commerce and Consumer Affairs
DEF Department of Defense
EDN Department of Education
GOV Office of the Governor
HHL Department of Hawaiian Home Lands
HMS Department of Human Services
HRD Department of Human Resources Development
HTH Department of Health
LAW Department of Law Enforcement
LBR Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
LNR Department of Land and Natural Resources
LTG Office of the Lieutenant Governor
PSD Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation
SUB Subsidies
TAX Department of Taxation
HB300 CDl FIN 2

Page 3
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
TRN Department of Transportation
UOH University of Hawaii
CCH City and County of Honolulu
COH County of Hawaii
COK County of Kauai
COM County of Maui
Means of financing” or "MOF” means the source from which
funds are appropriated or authorized to be expended for the
programs and projects specified in this Act. All appropriations
are followed by letter symbols. Such letter symbols, where
used, shall have the following meanings:
A general funds
B special funds
C general obligation bond fund
D general obligation bond fund with debt service cost to
be paid from special funds
E revenue bond funds
J federal aid interstate funds
K federal aid primary funds
L federal aid secondary funds
M federal aid urban funds
HB300 CDl FIN 3

Page 4
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
N federal funds
P other federal funds
R private contributions
S county funds
T trust funds
U interdepartmental transfers
V American Rescue Plan funds
W revolving funds
X other funds
"Position ceiling" means the maximum number of permanent
and temporary full-time equivalent positions that an expending
agency is authorized for a particular program during a specified
period or periods, as denoted by a single asterisk for permanent
full-time equivalent positions and a pound sign for temporary
full-time equivalent positions.
"Program ID" means the unique identifier for the specific
program and consists of the abbreviation for the organization
responsible for carrying out the program, followed by the
organization number for the program.
HB300 CDl FIN
■luniin

H.B. NO. gi
C.D. 1
PART II. PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATIONS. The following sums, or so much
thereof as may be sufficient to accomplish the purposes and
programs designated herein, are hereby appropriated or
authorized, as the case may be, from the means of financing
specified to the expending agencies designated for the fiscal
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
total expenditures and the number of positions in each fiscal
year of the biennium shall not exceed the sums and the position
ceiling indicated for each fiscal year, except as provided
elsewhere in this Act, or as provided by general law.
HB300 CDl FIN
■MiiiiHin

Page 6 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
1. BEDIOO - STRATEGIC MARKETING AND SUPPORT
10.00* 10.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING BED 3,893,040A 3,893,040A
BED 1,823,499W 1,823,499W
BED 700,OOOP 700,000P

2. BEDIOI - OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS
OPERATING BED 400,000A A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 5,000,OOOC C

3. BED105 - CREATIVE INDUSTRIES DIVISION
15.00* 15.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING BED 1,885,986A 1,921,494A
BED l,080,000B 1,080,OOOB

4. BED107 - FOREIGN TRADE ZONE
16.00* 16.00*
OPERATING BED 2,796,043B 2,796,043B

5. BED142 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
26.00* 26.00*
4.00# 4.00#
OPERATING BED 3,802,604A 3,802,952A

6. BED113 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - ADMINISTRATION AND GOVERNANCE
14.00* 14.00*
OPERATING BED 3,696,660A 3,696,660A
BED 26,977,0208 14,000,0008
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 36,400,OOOC C

7. BEDI14 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - BRANDING AND MARKETING
5.00* 5.00*
OPERATING BED 39,249,201A 39,249,201A

8. BED115 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - SPORTS AND SIGNATURE EVENTS
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING BED 7,318,075A 7,318,075A

9. BED116 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - DESTINATION STEWARDSHIP AND
COMMUNITY
7.00* 7.00*
HB300 GDI FIN
■IIHDHHIIIO

Page 7
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING BED 7,923,883A 7,923,883A

10. BED117 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - REGENERATIVE TOURISM DEVELOPMENT
3.00* 3.00*
OPERATING BED 3,762,181A 3,762,181A

11. BED118 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
OPERATING BED l,050,000A l,050,000A

12. AGRIOI - FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR AGRICULTURE
9.00* 9.00*-
OPERATING AGR 874,338A 874,338A
AGR 5,500,000W 5,500,000W

13. AGR122 - PLANT PEST AND DISEASE CONTROL
143.00* 143.00*
OPERATING AGR 21,335,989A 21,335,989A
AGR 4,130,800B 4,130,8008
AGR 512,962T 512,962T
AGR 212,095U 212,095U
AGR 50,360W 50,360W
AGR 365,946P 365,946P

14. AGR131 - RABIES QUARANTINE
32.32* 32.32*
OPERATING AGR 4,781,1108 4,781,1108

15. AGRI 32 - ANIMAL DISEASE CONTROL
25.68* 25.68*
OPERATING AGR 3,421,755A 3,352,755A
AGR 47,802B 47,802B
1.00# 1.00#
AGR 306,941P 306,941P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 7,000,000C C

16. LNR172 - FORESTRY - RESOURCE MANAGEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT
34.00* 34.00*
OPERATING LNR 8,808,994A 8,808,994A
LNR 2,455,4758 2,455,475B
1.00* 1.00*
LNR 7,100,000P 10,530,000P

17. AGR151 - QUALITY AND PRICE ASSURANCE
23.50* 23.50*
HB300 GDI FIN
■iiiiiiiiiim

Page 8 H.B. NO. ” ’
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING AGR 1,826,443A 1,826,443A
AGR 109,046B 109,046B
AGR 100,000N 100,OOON
AGR 300,000T 300,000T
AGR 186,848W 127,848W
AGR 138,624P 138,624P

18. AGR171 - AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT AND MARKETING
11.00* 11.00*
OPERATING AGR l,109,694A 1,067,694A
AGR 15,000B 15,000B
0.75* 0.75*
AGR 2,051,568N 2,051,568N
1.25* 1.25*
AGR 5,289,219P 5,289,219P

19. AGR141 - AGRICULTURAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT
26.50* 19.00*
OPERATING AGR 4,221,136A 1,798,532A
13.50* 13.50*
AGR 2,851,320B 2,851,320B
* 7.50*
AGR 2,747,123W 1,375,787W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGR 5,000,000C C
AGR l,000N N

20. AGRI 92 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE
33.00* 32.00*
OPERATING AGR 5,580,886A 5,556,126A
* 1.00*
AGR P 164,450P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS l,900,000C 2,200,000C

21. BED170 - AGRIBUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND RESEARCH
13.50* 13.50*
OPERATING BED 4,825,616A 4,823,166A
0.50* 0.50*
BED 82,126U 82,126U
2.00* 2.00*
6.00# 6.00#
BED 16,259,661W 4,048,264W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 111,201,0000 5,150,000C

22. AGR153 - AQUACULTURE DEVELOPMENT
HB300 CDl FIN

Page 9
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING AGR 978,519A 978,519A
AGR 125,0008 125,000B

23. BED120 - HAWAII STATE ENERGY OFFICE
1.00* 1.00*
25.00# 25.00#
OPERATING BED 2,571,816A 2,571,816A
BED 795,0008 795,0008
BED 7,146,250T 7,146,250T

24. BED143 - HAWAII TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
8.00* 8.00*
4.00# 4.00# <7^
OPERATING RPn d 7m 7Q=,a A ->ni nncA 9 "7Al TflcA
BED 1,604,2588 1,604,2588
BED 2,017,203W 2,017,203W
10.00# 10.00#
BED 994,214P 994,214P

25. BED146 - NATURAL ENERGY LABORATORY OF HAWAII AUTHORITY
17,00# 17.00#
OPERATING BED 7,929,3108 7,929,3108

26. BED138 - HAWAII GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE AUTHORITY
7.25# 7.25#
OPERATING BED 86,633,3188 86,639,6538
1.75# 1.75#
BED 444,261P 444,261P

27. LNR141 - WATER AND LAND DEVELOPMENT
24.00* 24.00*
OPERATING LNR 3,403,862A 3,403,862A
4.00* 4.00*
LNR 907,3308 907,3308
LNR 1 99,479T 1 99, 479'1
1NVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 2,000,000C C

28. BEDlhO - HAWA I [ COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
13.00* 13.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING BED l,526,750A l,526,750A
11.00* 11.00*
1.00# I.00#
HB300 CDl FIN

Page 10 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
BED 2,554,972B 2,554,972B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 38,000,0000 29,450,OOOC

29. BED160 ■ - HAWAII HOUSING FINANCE AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
OPERATING BED 3,100,000N 3,100,000N
23.00* 23.00*
48.00# 48.00#
BED 16,060,058W 15,889,058W
BED 3,000,OOOP 3,000,000P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 100,000,0000 140,000,0000


HB300 GDI FIN 10
■iiiniiHiM

Page 11 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
B. EMPLOYMENT
1. LBRlll - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
13.10* 13.10*
OPERATING LBR 6,822,007A 6,822,007A
LBR 5,364,646B 5,364,646B
57.20* 57.20*
34.00# 34.00#
LBR 6,550,000N 6,550,000N
LBR 2,891,173U 2,891,173U
0.70* 0.70*
LBR 300,000P 300,000P

2. LBR135 - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL
OPERATING LBR 455,026A 455,026A
7.00* 7.00*
LBR 10,700,000N 10,7OO,OOON

3. LBR171 - UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM
10.00* 10.00*
OPERATING LBR l,098,246A l,098,246A
LBR 2,173,756B 2,173,756B
187.50* 187.50*
LBR 18,000,000N 18,000,000N
LBR 341,400,000T 341,400,000T

4. LBR903 - OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
13.00* 13.00*
5.00# 5.00#
OPERATING LBR 4,971,563A 4,971,563A
LBR 5,000B 5,000B
4.00# 4.00#
LBR 6,517,000N 6,517,000N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LBR 20,000,000C C

5. HMS802 - VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
38.73* 38.73*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING HMS 5,056,561A 6,138,995A
73.27* 73.27*
HMS 19,176,876N 19,176,876N
HMS 2,000,000W 2,000,000W

6. LBR143 - HAWAII OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROGRAM
17.30* 17.30*
HB300 CDl FIN
iniiniiiiin

Page 12
H.B. NO. g]
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
0.50# 0.50#
OPERATING LBR l,393,204A l,393,204A
19.00* 19.00*
LBR 2,746,105W 2,746,105W
19.70* 19.70*
LBR 2,400,000P 2,400,OOOP

7. LBR152 - WAGE STANDARDS PROGRAM
20.00* 20.00*
OPERATING LBR 1,383,835A 1,442,931A
LBR 500,000B 500,OOOB

8. LBR153 - HAWAII CIVIL RIGHTS COMMISSION
22.50* 22.50*
OPERATING LBR 1,843,633A 1,843,633A
0.50* 0.50*
5.00# 5.00#
LBR 350,000P 350,OOOP

9. LBR183 - DISABILITY COMPENSATION PROGRAM
77.00* 77.00*
OPERATING LBR 8,679,642A 9,039,187A
11.00* 11.00*
5.00# 5.00#
LBR 24,157,551T 24,157,551T

10. LBR161 - HAWAII LABOR RELATIONS BOARD
3.00* 3.00*
7.00# 7.00#
OPERATING LBR l,138,087A l,138,087A

11. LBR812 - LABOR AND INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS APPEALS BOARD
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING LBR 1,209,410A l,209,410A

12. LBR901 - RESEARCH AND STATISTICS
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING LBR 178,081A 178,081A
4.00* 4.00*
1.00# 1.00#
LBR 440,322N 440,322N

13. LBR902 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
18.83* 18.83*
HB300 CDl FIN 12
IHWIIIIBIIIIIII

Page 13 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
3.46# 3.46#
OPERATING LBR 3,937,790A 2,912,790A
LBR 200,000B 200,000B
32.17* 32.17*
1.54# 1.54#
LBR 6,000,OOOP 6,000,OOOP
HB300 CDl FIN 13

Page 14 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
-hJbWk*nt\04~'000'O^MWUiht\03-'000'Oi-lWW.i4trtsOMOOO\Oi-IJb»>(.k<»U\01»'000\©‘-tihW^ C. TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES
TRN102 - DANIEL K. INOUYE INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT
661.00* 661.00*
15.00# 15.00#
OPERATING TRN 283,790,642B 285,933,581B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 17,061,OOOE 26,760,OOOE
TRN 1,OOON 1,OOON
2. TRN104 ■- GENERAL AVIATION
31.00* 31.00*
OPERATING TRN 19,811,421B 17,928,307B
3. TRNlll -- HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT
85.00* 85.00*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING TRN 26,440,201B 28,974,929B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 26,000,OOOE E
TRN 1,OOON N
4. TRN114 -- ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE
110.00* 110.00*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING TRN 34,282,904B 34,549,166B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 137,045,000E E
TRN 10,000,000N N
5. TRN116 -■ WAIMEA-KOHALA AIRPORT
4.00* 4.00*
OPERATING TRN l,338,058B 1,339,121B
6. TRN118 - ■ UPOLU AIRPORT
OPERATING TRN 51,lOOB 51,lOOB
. TRN131 -• KAHULUI AIRPORT
183.00* 183.00*
4.00# 4.00#
OPERATING TRN 52,283,lllB 52,419,7478
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 52,250,OOOE 57,500,OOOE
TRN 5,000,OOON N
8. TRN133 - HANA AIRPORT
3.00* 3.00*
OPERATING TRN 762,108B 762,525B
HB300 GDI FIN 14
IIIIMIIIIIIIH

Page 15 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
»KW^4l/t\0M000\)C»-)Jb>*t.b!4»U\04'000>'Oi-tMl*(.i4nt\0q'e00\O»-l*hi»t.»*lU\0M0Q0SOi-l*bW^
9. TRN135 - KAPALUA AIRPORT
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING TRN 3,133,189B 3,135,7708
10. TRN141 - MOLOKAI AIRPORT
14.00* 14.00*
OPERATING TRN 3,993,273B 3,998,5868
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 6,230,000E E
TRN 2,000,OOON N
11. TRN143 - KALAUPAPA AIRPORT
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING TRN 520,929B 520,9298
12. TRN151 - LANAI AIRPORT
14.00* 14.00*
OPERATING TRN 4,575,622B 4,584,7328
13. TRN161 - LIHUE AIRPORT
115.00* 115.00*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING TRN 32,974,694B 33,055,8758
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 9,225,000E 5,140,OOOE
TRN 1,OOON 4,600,OOON
14. TRN163 - PORT ALLEN AIRPORT
OPERATING TRN 1,841B 1,8418
15. TRN195 - AIRPORTS ADMINISTRATION
135.00* 135.00*
OPERATING TRN 476,268,398B 467,112,227B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 7,500,OOOB 7,500,0008
TRN 294,381,OOOE 751,666,OOOE
TRN 1,802,OOON 60,002,OOON
TRN 301,200,OOOX 200,OOOX
16. TRN301 - HONOLULU HARBOR
104.00* 104.00*
OPERATING TRN 33,294,7308 33,212,6708
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 24,992,0008 39,992,0008
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR
17. TRN303 - KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR
HB300 CDl FIN 15
iniiiNiiigniinii

Page 16 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
6.00* 6.00*
OPERATING TRN 2,258,009B 2,252,332B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 34,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,000R 4,OOOR

18. TRN311 - HILO HARBOR
15.00* 15.00*
OPERATING TRN 4,733,388B 4,728,916B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 44,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR

19. TRN313 - KAWAIHAE HARBOR
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING TRN 2,585,678B 2,585,027B

20. TRN331 - KAHULUI HARBOR
19.00* 19.00*
OPERATING TRN 6,732,925B 6,725,038B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 9,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR

21. TRN341 - KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING TRN 834,558B 834,216B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 4,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR

22. TRN361 - NAWILIWILI HARBOR
15.00* 15.00*
OPERATING TRN 4,579,638B 4,570,717B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 9,992,OOOB 4,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR

23. TRN363 - PORT ALLEN HARBOR
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING TRN 255,870B 255,379B

24. TRN351 - KAUMALAPAU HARBOR
1.00* 1.00*
HB300 CDl FIN 16

Page 17
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING TRN 514,295B 511,891B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,OOOB 1,992,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR

25. TRN395 - HARBORS ADMINISTRATION
72.00* 72.00*
OPERATING TRN 122,924,440B 103,372,3718
TRN 25,000,OOON 25,000,OOON
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 17,492,OOOB 17,492,OOOB
TRN 4,OOON 4,OOON
TRN 4,OOOR 4,OOOR

26. TRN333 - HANA HARBOR
OPERATING TRN 13,519B 13,519B

27. TRN501 - OAHU HIGHWAYS
184.00* 184.00*
OPERATING TRN 97,979,039B 98,253,732B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 5,445,OOOC C
TRN 14,898,OOOE 800,OOOE
TRN 22,134,OOON 3,200,OOON

28. TRN511 - HAWAII HIGHWAYS
117.50* 117.50*
OPERATING TRN 25,508,570B 25,522,385B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 4,500,OOOE 4,800,OOOE
TRN N 19,200,OOON
TRN 1,000,OOOS S

29. TRN531 - MAUI HIGHWAYS
90.00* 90.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING TRN 28,978,093B 28,041,366B
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 1,000,OOOB B
TRN 5,000,OOOE 100,OOOE
TRN 4,001,OOON 400,OOON

30. TRN561 - KAUAI HIGHWAYS
60.00* 60.00*
OPERATING TRN 15,191,7016 14,943,8996
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 1,000,OOOE 5,200,OOOE
TRN 4,000,OOON 20,800,OOON

HB300 CDl FIN

Page 18
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
31. TRN595 - HIGHWAYS ADMINISTRATION
OPERATING TRN 20,000,000A A
520.50* 520.50*
3.00# 3.00#
TRN 229,186,637B 207,904,208B
TRN 15,763,634N 16,213,634N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL TRN 22,721,000B 17,343,OOOB
TRN l,000,000C C
TRN 156,684,000E lll,324,000E
TRN 614,705,000N 426,975,OOON
TRN 700,0005 S

32. TRN597 - HIGHWAYS SAFETY
32.20* 32.20*
OPERATING TRN 12,319,296B 12,319,296B
6.00* 6.00*
TRN 6,495,670N 6,495,670N
0.80* 0.80*
TRN 1,214,379P 1,214,379P

33. TRN995 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
OPERATING TRN 350,OOOA A
110.00* 110.00*
2.00# 2.00#
TRN 33,851,5778 34,069,4848
1.00* 1.00*
TRN 12,784,696N 12,784,696N
TRN 743,067R 743,067R

34. TRN695 - ALOHA TOWER DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING TRN l,842,580B 1,842,5808


HB300 GDI FIN
iiiiiinMiiiiii

Page 19
H.B. NO. S
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
D. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
1. HTH840 - ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT
90.00* 90.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HTH 7,063,978A 7,379,458A
59.00* 59.00*
4.00# 4.00#
HTH 80,891,943B 80,891,943B
33.50* 33.50*
1.00# 1.00#
HTH 4,064,084N 4,064,084N
2.00* 2.00*
HTH 3,013,024U 3,013,024U
43.00* 43.00*
HTH 260,514,599W 260,514,599W
7.25* 7.25*
4.00# 4.00#
HTH 8,889,lllP 7,998,178P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH 10,995,000C 10,995,OOOC
HTH 54,964,000N 54,964,OOON

2. AGR846 - PESTICIDES
37.00* 37.00*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING AGR 2,729,255A 2,729,255A
AGR 2,598,038W 2,364,038W
2.00* 2.00*
1.00# 1.00#
AGR 464,629P 464,629P

3. LNR401 - ECOSYSTEM PROTECTION AND RESTORATION
64.00* 64.00*
0.50# 0.50#
OPERATING LNR 5, 526, 913A 5,526,913A
3.00* 3.00*
0.25# 0.25#
LNR 4,239,0548 4,239,054B
1.00* 1.00*
1.75# 1.75#
LNR 4,864,500N 4,889,500N
2.00* 2.00*
6.50# 6.50#
LNR 12,537,534P 283,534P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 1,150,OOOC C
HB300 GDI FIN 19
■iiinniH

Page 20
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

4. LNR402 - NATIVE RESOURCES AND FIRE PROTECTION PROGRAM
73.50* 73.50*
OPERATING LNR 26,434,031A 23,539,031A
18.50* 18.50*
1.00# 1.00#
LNR 3,679,077N 3,679,077N
LNR 106,475T 106,475T
7.00# 7.00#
LNR l,686,056U 1,686,056U
2.50* 2.50*
LNR 4,571,982P 2,883,534P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 10,500,000C C

5. LNR404 - WATER RESOURCES
28.00* 28.00*
OPERATING LNR 4,584,758A 4,484,758A
5.00* 5.00*
LNR 1,283,1238 1,283,1238
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 6,000,000C C

6. LNR405 - CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT
199.25* 199.25*
OPERATING LNR 20,509,745A 17,545,614A
LNR 2,021,4478 921,4478
3.75* 3.75*
LNR 958,875N 958,875N
LNR 32,671W 32,671W
LNR 100,000P 100,OOOP
. INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 4,450,000C C

7. LNR407 - NATURAL AREA RESERVES AND WATERSHED MANAGEMENT
69.50* 69.50*
4.00# 4.00#
OPERATING LNR ll,709,704A 11,334,704A
LNR 180,0008 180,0008
LNR 440,000N 440,000N
0.50* 0.50*
LNR 3,0OO,OOOP 3,000,OOOP
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 7,200,000C C

8. LNR906 - LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT
55.00* 55.00*
1.00# 1.00#
HB300 CDl FIN 20
iHiiMiiiiiin

Page 21
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING LNR 7,011,321A 7,061,839A
20.00* 20.00*
1.00# 1.00#
LNR 3,475,827B 3,475,827B
1.00# 1.00#
LNR 116,466P 116,466P

9. HTH849 - ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION
29.50* 29.50*
1.25# 1.25#
OPERATING HTH 3,878,888A 3,878,888A
2.15* 2.15*
0.60# 0.60#
HTH 189,937N 189,937N
11.00* 11.00*
HTH 2,826,328W 2,826,328W
11.95* 11.95*
2.15# 2.15#
HTH 2,330,057P 5,751,220P

10. LNR907 - AHA MOKU ADVISORY COMMITTEE
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING LNR 286,300A 286,300A

11. LNR908 - KAHOOLAWE ISLAND RESERVE COMMISSION
2.00* 2.00*
14.00# 14.00#
OPERATING LNR l,845,510A 1,845,510A

12. LNR909 - MAUNA KEA STEWARDSHIP & OVERSIGHT AUTHORITY
13.00# 13.00#
OPERATING LNR 14,000,800A 14,000,800A


HB300 GDI FIN 21
Miiiiiiiiiiniiii

Page 22
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
E. HEALTH
1. HTHIOO - COMMUNICABLE DISEASE AND PUBLIC HEALTH NURSING
236.87* 236.87*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HTH 33,001,090A 33,067,876A
22.00# 22.00#
HTH 8,827,137N 8,827,137N
3.00* 3.00*
HTH 637,849U 637,849U
11.00* 11.00*
23.50# 23.50#
HTH 5,311,894P 5,311,894P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 8,000,000C C

2. HTH131 - DISEASE OUTBREAK CONTROL
26.60* 26.60*
OPERATING HTH 2,333,942A 2,604,086A
20.40* 20.40*
9.00# 9.00#
HTH 20,255,445N 3,705,177N
1.00* 1.00*
21.50# 21.50#
HTH 9,378,970P 9,378,970?

3. HTH730 - EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES AND INJURY PREVENTION SYSTEM
10.00* 10.00*
2.20# 2.20#
OPERATING HTH 59,091,232A 59,321,974A
6.00# 6.00#
HTH 22,323,419B 22,323,419B
3.00# 3.00#
HTH 420,000P 420,000P

4. HTH560 - FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES
114.00* 114.00*
0.50# 0.50#
OPERATING HTH 45,499,911A 45,566,966A
11.40* 11.40*
2.00# 2.00#
HTH 17,965,804B 17,965,804B
99.80* 99.80*
8.50# 8.50#
HTH 38,121,215N 38,121,215N
1.00# 1.00#
HB300 GDI FIN
iiiiiiiiiiniii

Page 23
H.B. NO. ”
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HTH 101,558U 101,558U
15.30* 15.30*
14.00# 14.00#
HTH 12,523,019P 12,523,019P

5. HTH590 - CHRONIC DISEASE PREVENTION AND HEALTH PROMOTION
46.50* 46.50*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING HTH 7,041,748A 7,041,748A
HTH 48,706,3566 48,706,3566
1.00* 1.00*
HTH l,192,408U 1,192,4080
9.50* 9.50*
17.50# 17.50#
HTH 6,740,166P 6,740,166P

6. HTH595 - HEALTH RESOURCES ADMINISTRATION
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING HTH 244,093A 244,093A

7 . HTH596 - OFFICE OF MEDICAL CANNA8IS CONTROL & REGULATION
21.00* 21.00*
5.00# 5.00#
OPERATING HTH 3,109,260A 3,109,260A
7.00* 7.00*
HTH 2,578,5186 2,425,3688

8. HTH210 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION - CORPORATE OFFICE
54.50* 54.50*
OPERATING HTH 17,509,2806 17,509,2808

9. HTH211 - KAHUKU HOSPITAL
OPERATING HTH 2,157,500A 2,032,500A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH 5,800,000C 5,000,000C

10 HTH212 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION - REGIONS
OPERATING HTH 216,537,303A 199,816,303A
2,337.85* 2,337.85*
HTH 582,286,1856 582,286,1856
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH 28,839,000C 53,709,000C
HTH R 25,OOO,O00R

11 HTH213 - ALII COMMUNITY CARE
OPERATING HTH 3,500,0006 3,500,0008
HB300 GDI FIN 23
■■ininin

Page 24
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

12. HTH214 - MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM, A KFH LLC
OPERATING HTH 12,000,000A 6,000,000A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH 6,000,000C 6,000,OOOC

13. HTH215 - HHSC - OAHU REGION
OPERATING HTH 8,000,000A 14,000,OOOA
439.00* 439.00*
HTH 48,500,000b 48,400,OOOB
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HTH 5,600,000C 5, 110,OOOC

14. HTH420 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - OUTPATIENT
343.00* 343.00*
49.50# 49.50#
OPERATING HTH 89,622,044A 93,667,271A
HTH ll,610,000B 11,610,OOOB
1.00# 1.00#
HTH 2,333,370N 2,333,370N
1.00# 1.00#
HTH ]37,363P 137,363P

15. HTH430 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - INPATIENT
853.00* 853.00*
zi?I 20.00# 20.00#
OPERATING HTH 157, &45-,-e-&&A 134,673,554A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 23,650,OOOC 16,750,OOOC

16. HTH440 - ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE DIVISION
29.00* 29.00*
OPERATING HTH 20,395,713A 20,395,7]3A
HTH 750,000B 750,OOOB
1.00* 1.00*
HTH 9,038,656N 9,038,656N
5.00# 5.00#
HTH 6,654,376P 6, 722,746P

17. HTH460 - CHILD AND ADOLESCENT MENTAL HEALTH
159.50* 159.50*
8.00# 8.00#
OPERATING HTH 63,631,355A 63,631,355A
29.00* 29.00*
HTH 15,375,579B 15, 375, 579li
5.00# 5.00#
HTH 2,339,630N 2,339,630N
HB300 GDI FTN 24

Page 25 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027
2.00# 2.00#
HTH 2,281,992U 2,281,992U

18. HTH501 - DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
211.00* 211.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HTH 121,506,572A 131,398,120A
5.00* 5.00*
HTH 7,747,738B 7,747,738B

19. HTH495 - BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING HTH 210,907A 210,907A

20. HTH610 - ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
127.00* 127.00*
OPERATING HTH 9,207,720A 9,292,836A
34.00* 34.00*
HTH 4,487,489B 4,936,115B
2.00* 2.00*
HTH 158,OOON 158,OOON
3.00* 3.00*
HTH 271,269U 271,269U
2.00* 2.00*
HTH 396,994P 396,994P

21. HTH710 - STATE LABORATORY SERVICES
69.00* 69.00*
OPERATING HTH 9,189,196A 9,262,196A
0.75* 0.75*
2.00# 2.00#
HTH 272,901B 272,901B
9.00# 9.00#
HTH 1,029,222N 1,029,222N
0.25* 0.25*
HTH 23,967W 23,967W
2.00# 2.00#
HTH 429,999P 429,999P

22. HTH720 - HEALTH CARE ASSURANCE
22.55* 22.55*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING HTH 4,030,204A 4,030,204A
2.85* 2.85*
HB300 GDI FIN
imtoiiiii

Page 26
H.B. NO. S
j
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HTH 2,355,0008 2,105,0008
21.60* 21.60*
HTH 4,841,562P 4,841,562P

23. HTH906 - STATE HEALTH PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT AGENCY
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING HTH 941,225A 726,733A
HTH 340,0008 114,0008

24. HTH760 - HEALTH STATUS MONITORING
38.50* 38.50*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING HTH 3,079,488A 2,258,388A
2.00# 2.00#
HTH 530,3188 530,3188
5.00* 5.00*
HTH 627,294P 627,294P

25. HTH905 - DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL
2.50* 2.50*
OPERATING HTH 262,940A 262,940A
5.00* 5.00*
HTH 527,570N 527,570N

26. HTH907 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
180.00* 180.00*
11.00# 11.00#
OPERATING HTH 36,764,229A 32,038,805A
8.00* 8.00*
20.00# 20.00#
HTH 5,275,000N 5,275,000N
4.00# 4.00#
HTH 684,932P 684,932P

27. HTH908 - OFFICE OF LANGUAGE ACCESS
6.00* 6.00*
OPERATING HTH 714,494A 714,494A


HB300 CDl FIN 26
liiiiiiiiiinia

Page 27
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
F. SOCIAL SERVICES
1 HMS301 - CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES
303.75* 303.75*
OPERATING HMS 50,570,717A 50,570,717A
1.00* 1.00*
HMS 6,124,053b 6,124,053B
84.75* 84.75*
HMS 49,452,950N 49,452,950N
HMS 400,000P 400,000P

2, HMS302 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR CHILD CARE
38.92* 38.92*
OPERATING HMS 2,840,528A 2,840,528A
38.08* 38.08*
HMS 14,137,770N 14,137,770N

3. HMS303 - CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 48,265,586A 48,265,586A
HMS 31,542,000N 31,542,OOON

4 . HMS305 - CASH SUPPORT FOR CHILD CARE
OPERATING HMS 57,811,811A 57,811,811A
HMS 69,565,754N 69,565,754N

5. HMS501 - IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS
18.50* 18.50*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HMS 10,764,943A 10,800,451A
0.50* 0.50*
0.50# 0.50#
HMS 2,050,000N 1,534,135N

6. HMS503 - HAWAII YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY (HYCF)
90.00* 90.00*
OPERATING HMS 9,992,933A 9,992,933A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 3,720,000C C

7. DEF112 - SERVICES TO VETERANS
28.00* 28.00*
OPERATING DEF 2,066,978A 2,066,978A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL DEF 35,000,000C C
DEF 58,000,000P P

8 . HMS601 ■- ADULT PROTECTIVE AND COMMUNITY SERVICES
HB300 GDI FIN 27
■IHHIIIIIII

Page 28
H.B. NO. S-J
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
69.48* 69.48*
OPERATING HMS 6,875,326A 6,875,326A
7.02* 7.02*
3.00# 3.00#
HMS 838,010N 838,OlON
HMS 10,000R 10,OOOR
HMS 387,560U 387,560U
HMS l,321,390P l,321,390P

9. HMS202 - AGED, BLIND AND DISABLED PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 4,029,480a 4,029,480A

10 HMS204 - GENERAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 23,889,056A 23,889,056A
HMS 3,000,000B 3,000,OOOB

11 HMS206 - FEDERAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 8,345,024N 8,345,024N

12 HMS211 - CASH SUPPORT FOR FAMILIES - SELF-SUFFICIENCY
OPERATING HMS 26,715,965A 26,715,965A
HMS 44,000,000N 44,000,000N

13 HMS220 - RENTAL HOUSING SERVICES
5.00* 5.00*
OPERATING HMS 4,694,409A 4,694,409A
191.00* 191.00*
4.50# 4.50#
HMS 106,838,200N 112,088,200N
17.00* 17.00*
HMS 5,134,715W 5,187,506W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 68,000,000C C


14 HMS229 - HAWAII PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY ADMINISTRATION
2.00* 2.00*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING HMS 502,838A 502,838A
HMS 27,864,996N 27,840,930N
119.00* 119.00*
47.00# 47.00#
HMS 17,416,598W 17,676,361W

15 . HMS222 ■- RENTAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES
HB300 GDI FIN
■Hlllllllili

Page 29 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING HMS 1,557,121A 1,557,121A
34.00* 34.00*
1.00# 1.00#
HMS 73,368,975N 77,039,700N

16. HMS224 - HOMELESS SERVICES
11.00* 11.00*
OPERATING HMS 27,931,773A 27,931,773A
HMS 814,OOON 814,OOON

17. HMS605 - COMMUNITY-BASED RESIDENTIAL & MEDICAID FACILITY SUPPORT
OPERATING HMS 17,810,955A 17,810,955A

18. HMS401 - HEALTH CARE PAYMENTS
OPERATING HMS 1,031,466,906A 1,031,466,906A
HMS 230,000,OOOB 230,000,OOOB
HMS 2,291,497,122N 2,291,497,122N
HMS 6,781,921U 6,781,921U
HMS 15,798,564P 15,798,564P

19. HMS236 - CASE MANAGEMENT FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY
287.43* 287.43*
OPERATING HMS 19,875,373A 19,673,479A
226.57* 226.57*
HMS 26,545,359N 26,393,053N
HMS 30,237P 30,237P

20. HMS238 - DISABILITY DETERMINATION
50.00* 50.00*
OPERATING HMS 8,859,927N 8,859,927N

21. ATG500 - CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT SERVICES
69.70* 69.70*
0.34# 0.34#
OPERATING ATG 5,448,469A 5,448,469A
ATG 2,231,224T 2,231,224T
135.30* 135.30*
0.66# 0.66#
ATG 20,006,088P 20,006,088P

22. HMS237 - EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING
OPERATING HMS 469,505A 469,505A
HMS 2,575,945N 2,575,945N
HB300 GDI FIN
■illlllllllll

Page 30 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4bWki4iy(\0^00^0‘-l»K)U.i4nt\0^00^0^4bW^4AL^OJ--eOO\0‘-lJbW^4«»t\04-000\Oi-lJslW->t• 23. HHL602 - PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT FOR HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADS
OPERATING HHL 10,000,OOOA 10,000,OOOA
HHL 101,866,373B 4,824,709B
4-00* 4.00*
8.00# 8.00#
HHL 24,126,731N 24,126,731N
HHL 3,740,534T 3,740,534T
HHL 7,000,OOOW 7,000,OOOW
3.00# 3.00#
HHL 393,600P 442,800P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HHL 20,000,000C C
24. HHL625 - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT
200.00* 200.00*
OPERATING HHL 18,032,234A 18,032,234A
25. HTH904 - EXECUTIVE OFFICE ON AGING
17.60* 17.60*
3.35# 3.35#
OPERATING HTH 12,988,560A 13,024,068A
7.40* 7.40*
1.00# 1.00#
HTH 10,405,377N 10,405,377N
8.00# 8.00#
HTH 1,223,791P 1,223,791P
26. HTH520 - DISABILITY AND COMMUNICATIONS ACCESS BOARD
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING HTH 724,846A 767,346A
13.00* 13.00*
HTH 2,186,855B 2,186,855B
2.00* 2.00*
HTH 314,641U 314,641U
27. HMS902 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR HEALTH CARE PAYMENTS
137.00* 137.00*
4.50# 4.50#
OPERATING HMS 16,133,771A 16,133,771A
0.87* 0.87*
HMS 30,104,3676 30,104,367B
145.63* 145.63*
16.50# 16.50#
HMS 96,345,000N 96,345,OOON
HB300 GDI FIN 30
lllilHIIIIHII

Page 31 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HMS 1,200,OOOP 1,200,OOOP

28. HMS903 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY SERVICES
51.30* 51.30*
OPERATING HMS 48,609,196A 48,604,950A
46.70* 46.70*
HMS 95,422,009N 95,418,155N
HMS 19,560,000P 19,560,OOOP

29. HMS904 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS
151.59* 151.59*
8.00# 5.00#
OPERATING HMS 18,703,261A 14,292,045A
31.41* 31.41*
6.00# #
HMS 17,288,921N 4,788,768N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HMS 10,000,OOOC C

30. HMS901 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR SOCIAL SERVICES
33.50* 33.50*
OPERATING HMS 4,287,230A 3,487,230A
9.50* 9.50*
HMS 3,246,986N 3,246,986N

31. HMS777 - OFFICE ON HOMELESSNESS AND HOUSING SOLUTIONS
8.00* 8.00*
OPERATING HMS 611,040A 611,040A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL HMS 24,400,000C 13,000,OOOC

32. HMS555 - OFFICE OF WELLNESS AND RESILIENCE
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING HMS l,346,000A l,346,000A


HB300 GDI FIN
iiiiniiiiiiiiii

Page 32 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
G. FORMAL EDUCATION
1 EDNIOO -- SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING
12,397.75* 12,397.75*
680.25# 680.25#
OPERATING EDN 1,301,966,939A 1,319,319,292A
EDN 5,251,6938 5,251,6938
EDN 167,203,642N 167,203,642N
EDN 13,390,000T 13,390,000T
EDN 7,495,605U 7,495,6050
9.00* 9.00*
EDN 3,239,686W 3,239,301W
1.00* 1.00*
EDN 21,414,6578 21,414,657P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL EDN 323,300,000C 46,500,000C
EDN P 120,000,000P

2. EDN150 - SPECIAL EDUCATION AND STUDENT SUPPORT SERVICES
5,348.50* 5,368.50*
1,228.25# 1,228.25#
OPERATING EDN 520,838,678A 525,281,027A
EDN 250,0008 250,0008
2.00* 2.00*
33.00# 33.00#
EDN 60,084,267N 61,584,267N
14.00* 14.00*
EDN ll,000,000W ll,000,000W
EDN 5,950,000P 5,950,000P

3. EDN200 - INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT
457.00* 457.00*
48.00# 48.00#
OPERATING EDN 92,999,004A 93,374,921A
2.00# 2.00#
EDN 500,000N 5OO,OO0N
1.00# 1.00#
EDN 273,794P 273,794P

4. EDN300 - STATE ADMINISTRATION
422.00* 424.00*
7.00# 7.00#
OPERATING EDN 48,692,750A 47,007,968A
EDN 112,140N 112,140N
EDN 3,807,440P 3,807,440P

HB300 GDI FIN

Page 33 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
5. EDN400 - SCHOOL SUPPORT
849.50* 849.50*
5.00# 5.00# ‘^<2-
OPERATING 380,A edn A o c non n r A T<
11.00* 11.00*
EDN 44,200,920B 44,200,920B
718.50* 718.50*
98.50# 98.50#
EDN 74,600,OOON 74,600,OOON
EDN 150,OOOR 150,OOOR
4.00* 4.00*
2.00# 2.00#
EDN 11,597,927W 11,597,927W
EDN 1,000,OOOP 1,000,OOOP

6. EDN450 - SCHOOL FACILITIES AUTHORITY
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING EDN 1,731,283A 1,738,979A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL EDN 55,000,000C C

7. EDN500 - SCHOOL COMMUNITY SERVICES
42.00* 42.00*
6.00# 6.00#
OPERATING EDN 6,296,201A 6,325,235A
EDN 1,633,908B l,633,908B
2.00# 2.00#
EDN 3,266,757N 3,266,757N
EDN 23,224,665W 23,224,665W
EDN 300,OOOP 300,OOOP

8. EDN600 - CHARTER SCHOOLS
OPERATING EDN .159, 798,565A 162,578,377A
EDN 5,042,OOON 5,042,OOON

9. EDN612 - CHARTER SCHOOLS COMMISSION AND ADMINISTRATION
81.12* 81.12*
OPERATING EDN 12,554,269A 12,564,269A
6.88* 6.88*
EDN 1,800,OOON 1,800,OOON

10. EDN700 - EARLY LEARNING
281.00* 331.00*
OPERATING EDN 21,305,769A 24,749,084A
EDN 3,000,0008 3,000,0008
■ HB3 ■ 00 ■ GDI ■ FI ■ N 33

Page 34 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
1.00# 1.00#
EDN 125,628N 125,628N
2.00# 2.00#
EDN 380,000P 380,000P

11. BUF745 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - DOE
OPERATING BUF 552,407,076A 572,505,610A

12. BUF765 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - DOE
OPERATING BUF 187,755,868A 191,510,985A

13. BUF725 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - DOE
OPERATING BUF 446,515,250A 521,973,994A

14. AGS807 - SCHOOL R&M, NEIGHBOR ISLAND DISTRICTS
81.00* 81.00*
OPERATING AGS 6,973,068A 6,951,567A
10.00* 10.00*
AGS 2,346,640U 2,346,640U

15. EDN407 - PUBLIC LIBRARIES
566.50* 567.50*
OPERATING EDN 47,850,582A 47,632,130A
EDN 4,000,000B 4,000,000B
EDN 2,000,000N 2,000,000N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 27,000,000C 25,000,000C

16. DEF114 - HAWAII NATIONAL GUARD YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY
24.50# 24.50#
OPERATING DEF 3,885,050A 3,885,050A
73.50# 73.50#
DEF 6,482,477P 6,482,477P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL DEF 8,000,000C C

17. UOHIOO - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA
2,969.64* 2,969.64*
42.25# 42.25#
OPERATING 4. oM. <1 0“ 1 n ww, ‘J U'J.I A
368.25* 368.25*
2.00# 2.00#
UOH 36I,552,962B 361,552,962B
75.06* 75.06*
UOH 6,873,565N 6,873,565N
28.00* 28.00*
HB300 CDl FIN 34

Page 35
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
UOH 65,569,059W 65,569,059W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 59,750,000C 28,500,OOOC
UOH 30,750,000E 28,500,OOOE

18. UOHllO ■- UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, JOHN A. BURNS SCHOOL OF MEDICINE
209.03* 209.03*
3.50# 3.50#
OPERATING UOH 27,613,321A 27,613,321A
UOH 28,917,688B 28,917,688B
UOH 8,010,453W 8,010,453W

19. UOH210 -- UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, HILO
534.25* 534.25*
7.00# 7.00#
OPERATING UOH 50,610,150A 50,727,650A
25.00* 25.00*
UOH 44,435,015B 44,435,015B
UOH 443,962N 443,962N
2.00* 2.00*
UOH 7,489,592W 7,489,592W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 15,000,000C C

20. UOH220 - ■ SMALL BUSINESSi DEVELOPMENT
11.00# 11.00#
OPERATING UOH 978,941a 978,941A

21. UOH700 -■ UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, WEST OAHU
246.50* 246.50*
1.50# 1.50#
OPERATING UOH 23,838,504A 24,015,377A
UOH 22,028,269B 22,028,269B
UOH 802,037N 802,037N
UOH 2,097,704W 2,097,704W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 6,500,000C C

22. UOH800 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, COMMUNITY COLLEGES
1,825.50* 1,825.50*
46.00# 46.00#
OPERATING UOH 192,200,937A 192,200,937A
UOH 75,650,2966 75,650,296B
0.50* 0.50*
UOH 4,428,296N 4,428,296N
34.00* 34.00*
UOH 31,826,332W 31,826,332W
HB300 GDI FIN

Page 36 300
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 45,000,000C 10,000,OOOC

23 UOH900 -■ UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, SYSTEMWIDE SUPPORT
424.00* 411.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING UOH 65,093,776A 65,093,776A
14.00* 14.00*
UOH 24,242,602B 24,242,602B
4.00* 4.00*
4.00# 4.00#
UOH l,094,875N 1,094,875N
2.00* 15.00*
UOH 18,501,700W 18,501,700W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 50,504,000C 4,OOOC

24 BUF748 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - UH
OPERATING BUF 219,919,128A 224,317,511A

25 BUF768 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - UH
OPERATING BUF 68,661,870A 70,035,107A

26 BUF728 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - UH
OPERATING BUF 165,254,696A 193,181,876A

27 UOH115 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, CANCER CENTER
37.00* 37.00*
OPERATING UOH 3,797,693A 3,797,693A


HB300 CDl FIN 36

Page 37 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
H. CULTURE AND RECREATION
1 UOH881 - AQUARIA
9.00* 9.00*
OPERATING UOH 919,917A 919,917A
7.00* 7.00*
UOH 3,517,7178 3,517,7178
UOH 996,530W 996,530W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL UOH 1,702,OOOC C

2. AGS881 - STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS
1.50* 17.75*
OPERATING AGS 10,435,556A 14,432,957A
AGS 3,335,1508 3,335,1508
★ 4.25*
AGS 523,074N 992,771N
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 8,500,OOOC C

3. LNR802 - HISTORIC PRESERVATION
45.00* 45.00*
OPERATING LNR 4,520,402A 4,520,402A
3.00* 3.00*
LNR 923,3978 923,3978
6.00* 6.00*
LNR 751,525N 751,525N

4 . LNR804 - FOREST AND OUTDOOR RECREATION
37.50* 37.50*
OPERATING LNR 4,812,230A 4,812,230A
3.00* 3.00*
LNR 917,1458 917,1458
19.00* 19.00*
LNR 5,396,897N 5,396,897N
3.00* 3.00*
LNR 913,329W 913,329W

5. LNR806 - PARKS ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION
155.00* 155.00*
OPERATING LNR 12,886,065A 12,886,065A
LNR 31,094,5368 31,094,5368
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 8,40O,0O0C 2,150,OOOC
LNR 750,000N 250,OOON

6. LNR801 - OCEAN-BASED RECREATION
7.00* 7.00*
HB300 GDI FIN 37
■lilllllll

Page 38 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING LNR 478,396A 478,396A
124.00* 124.00*
LNR 42,965,4866 42,965,4866
LNR l,500,000N 1,500,OOON
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 28,650,000C C

BED180 - SPECTATOR EVENTS & SHOWS -ALOHA STADIUM
18.00* 18.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING BED 8,772,3566 8,772,3566


HB300 CDl FIN

Page 39
H.B. NO. S,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
I. PUBLIC SAFETY
1. PSD402 - HALAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
410.00* 410.00*
OPERATING PSD 39,211,885A 39,211,885A

2. PSD403 - KULANI CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
83.00* 83.00*
OPERATING PSD 7,099,249A 7,O99,249A

3. PSD404 - WAIAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
112.00* 112.00*
OPERATING PSD 9,032,631A 9,032,631A

4. PSD405 - HAWAII COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
193.00* 193.00*
OPERJ^TING
PSD 15,855,815A 15,855,815A

5. PSD406 - MAUI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
205.00* 205.00*
OPERATING PSD 16,652,787A 16,652,787A

6. PSD407 - OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
500.00* 500.00*
OPERATING PSD 43,886,972A 43,160,178A

7. PSD408 - KAUAI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
74.00* 74.00*
OPERATING PSD 6,628,031A 6,628,031A

8. PSD409 - WOMEN'S COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
269.00* 269.00*
OPERATING PSD 20,991,799A 20,991,799A

9. PSD410 - INTAKE SERVICE CENTERS
73.00* 73.00*
OPERATING PSD 5,891,809A 5,891,809A

10. PSD420 - CORRECTIONS PROGRAM SERVICES
185.00* 185.00*
OPERATING PSD 26,143,271a 26,143,271A
PSD l,045,989N 1,045,989N

11. PSD421 - HEALTH CARE
264.60* 264.60*
HB300 GDI FIN
■lUIHIIfl

Page 40 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING PSD 38,877,361A 38,877,361A

12. PSD422 - HAWAII CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES
2.00* 2.00*
42.00# 42.00#
OPERATING PSD 10,884,725W 10,884,725W

13. PSD808 - NON-STATE FACILITIES
9.00* 9.00*
OPERATING PSD 42,589,908A 42,589,908A

14. LAW502 - NARCOTICS ENFORCEMENT DIVISION
14.00* 14.00*
OPERATING LAW 1,713,945A 1,713,945A
8.00* 8.00*
LAW l,004,853W 1,004,853W
LAW 800,000P 800,OOOP

15. LAWS03 - SHERIFF
318.00* 318.00*
OPERATING LAW 28,441,127A 28,623,526A
LAW 600,000N 600,OOON
150.00* 150.00*
LAW 19,616,1160 19,616,116U
LAW 600,000P 600,OOOP

16. LAW504 - CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION DIVISION
16.00* 16.00*
6.00# 6.00#
OPERATING 3,462,585A
■’ ' 2.00* 2.00*
5.00# 5.00#
LAW 731,972U 731,972U

17. LAWSOb - LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING DIVISION
8.00* 8.00*
OPERATING LAW 2,668,464A 2,668,464A

18. LAW900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
72.00* 72.00*
OPERATING <^LAW 30; 894, 244A 16, 957,744A
'^LAW 5,000,0000 5,000,0000

INVESTMENT CAPITAL LAW 3,000,0000 C

HB300 GDI FIN

Page 41
H.B. NO. gi
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
i-l»stW.i4ntsOU-000\O.-i»KWX4m\0M000SO‘-l>KW.»iUV\04-e0©\O‘-lWWki4A(^0J'00©\O->JbW
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
19. LAW901 - OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY
14.00* 14.00*
8.50# 8.50#
OPERATING LAW 2,362,031A 2,362,031A
LAW 3,724,886N 4,551,095N
LAW 9,405,469P 9,550,715P
20. PSD611 - ADULT PAROLE DETERMINATIONS
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING PSD 569,373A 569,373A
21. PSD612 - ADULT PAROLE SUPERVISION AND COUNSELING
61.00* 61.00*
OPERATING PSD 5,211,808A 5,211,808A
22. PSD613 - CRIME VICTIM COMPENSATION COMMISSION
13.00* 13.00*
OPERATING PSD 1,125,638A 1,125,638A
PSD 1,186,0178 1,186,0178
1.00# 1.00#
PSD 859,315P 859,315P
23. PSD900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
149.00* 149.00*
OPERATING PSD 25,287,667A 25,287,667A
4.00* 4.00*
PSD 1,331,9678 1,331,9678
PSD 75,065T 75,065T
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 64,750,000C 15,000,000C
PSD 10,000,000C C
24. ATG231 - STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION AND IDENTIFICATION
23.50* 23.50*
OPERATING ATG 2,614,592A 2,497,809A
24.50* 24.50*
ATG 4,370,515W 4,370,515W
ATG l,204,841P 1,204,841P
25. LNR810 - PREVENTION OF NATURAL DISASTERS
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING LNR 110,000A 110,000A
8.00* 8.00*
LNR 7,660,5568 7,660,5568
LNR 10,522,413P 1,160,621P
HB300 GDI FIN 41
l■■lllllll■l

Page 42 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

26. DEFllO - AMELIORATION OF PHYSICAL DISASTERS
100.25* 100.25*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING DEF 10,455,364A 10,256,912A
21.75* 21.75*
1.50# 1.50#
DEF l,430,238P 1,430,238P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL DEF 725,OOOC C

27. DEF116 - HAWAII ARMY AND AIR NATIONAL GUARD •
19.75* 19.75*
OPERATING DEF 7,081,247A 7,081,247A
99.25* 99.25*
20.00# 20.00#
DEF 40,051,745P 40,210,106P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL DEF 1,173,OOOC C
DEF 3,223,000P P

28. DEF118 - HAWAII EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY
26.00* 26.00*
90.00# 90.00#
OPERATING DEF 14,097,375A 14,097,375A
DEF 500,000B 500,0008
DEF 4,156,958N 4,156,958N
2.00# 2.00#
DEF 500,000w 500,OOOW
25.00# 25.00#
DEF 22,497,034P 22,497,034P
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 6,500,OOOC 6,500,OOOC
AGS l,500,000P 1,500,000P


HB300 GDI FIN
iiiiiniiiiin

Page 43 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
J. INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS
1. CCA102 - CABLE TELEVISION
6.00* 6.00*
OPERATING CCA 2,511,181B 2,507,752B
»KWUil»L\04>-000'0*-lJb>U^m\OMOOO>'0‘->)Ki»tk*hl\OMOOOSO‘-l»sH*<^«/t\OM'OOOSO-HJbWUi
CCA103 - CONSUMER ADVOCATE FOR COMMUNICATION, UTILITIES , AND
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES
25.00* 25.00*
OPERATING CCA 4,944,320B 4,944,3208
3. CCA104 - FINANCIAL SERVICES REGULATION
43.00* 43.00*
OPERATING CCA 6,417,109B 6,417,1098
CCA 301,OOOT 301,OOOT
. CCA105 - PROFESSIONAL AND VOCATIONAL LICENSING
72.00* 72.00*
11.00# 11.00#
OPERATING CCA 9,909,7308 9,909,7308
8.00* 8.00*
4.00# 4.00#
CCA 2,880,256T 2,880,256T
5. CCA106 - INSURANCE REGULATORY SERVICES
95.00* 95.00*
OPERATING CCA 23,746,7848 22,746,7848
CCA 201,OOOT 201,OOOT
6. CCA107 - POST-SECONDARY EDUCATION AUTHORIZATION
1.00* 1.00*
OPERATING CCA 249,052B 249,0528
7. CCA901 - PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
69.00* 69.00*
OPERATING CCA 19,725,310B 19,777,2918
8. CCAllO - OFFICE OF CONSUMER PROTECTION
20.00* 20.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING CCA 3,833,6798 3,833,6798
CCA 100,681T 100,681T
9. AGR812 - MEASUREMENT STANDARDS
10.00* 10.00*
HB300 GDI FIN 43
■■BHIilllll

Page 44 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
w»K»>tLi4At\04'OQO\0.-HJstJ»L.i4nC\0^00^0‘—lJbW^4iyt\0^00^0‘-)Jbl>(.»*»a
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
OPERATING AGR 746,480A 746,480A
10. CCAlll - BUSINESS REGISTRATION AND SECURITIES REGULATION
77.00* 77.00*
OPERATING CCA 10,459,932B 10,432,8956
11. CCA112 - REGULATED INDUSTRIES COMPLAINTS OFFICE
66.00* 66.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING CCA 8,930,9406 8,930,940B
12. CCA191 - GENERAL SUPPORT
54.00* 54.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING CCA 24,860,6596 12,858,2906
13. AGS105 - ENFORCEMENT OF INFORMATION PRACTICES
10.50* 10.50*
OPERATING AGS l,258,905A l,258,905A
14. BUF151 - OFFICE OF THE PUELIC DEFENDER
133.50* 133.50*
OPERATING BUF 15,137,691A 15,137,691A
15. LNRlll - CONVEYANCES AND RECORDINGS
56.00* 56.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING LNR 7,731,946B 7,731,9466
16. HMS888 - COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF WOMEN
1.00* 1.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING HMS 184,462A 184,462A
HB300 GDI FIN
ill■lll■ln

Page 45 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
K. GOVERNMENT-WIDE SUPPORT
1. GOVlOO - OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
24.00* 24.00*
23.00# 23.00#
OPERATING 4,551, STZ A C^CLgOV 4,701, 0-72A- 4,551,872A

2. LTGIOO - OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR
17.00* 17.00*
OPERATING LTG 2,251,665A 2,251,665A
LTG 312,000B 312,OOOB

3. BED144 - STATEWIDE PLANNING AND COORDINATION
30.00* 30.00*
8.00# 7.00#
OPERATING BED 4,580,161A 4,280,161a
5.00# 5.00#
BED 2,041,871N 2,041,871N
BED 2,000,000W 2,000,OOOW
INVESTMENT CAPITAL BED 7,500,000C C

4. BED130 - ECONOMIC PLANNING AND RESEARCH
18.46* 18.46*
5.00# 5.00#
OPERATING BED 5,744,533A 5,744,533A
8.04* 8.04*
BED 864,351P 864,351P

5. BUFIOI - DEPARTMENTAI. ADMINISTRATION AND BUDGET DIVISION
53.00* 58.00*
OPERATING BUF 14,051,217A 13,504,737A
BUF 427,305,0006 427,305,OOOB

6. BUFI03 - VACATION PAYOUT - STATEWIDE
OPERATING BUF 9,700,000A 9,700,OOOA

7. AGS871 - CAMPAIGN SPENDING COMMISSION
7.00* 7.00*
OPERATING AGS 2,757,314A 1,027,919a
AGS l,043,732T l,043,732T

8. AGS879 - OFFICE OF ELECTIONS
16.50* 16.50*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING AGS 6,452,228A 2,595,761A
HB300 GDI FIN 4 b

Page 46 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
0.50* 0.50*
1.00# 1.00#
AGS 99,694N 99,694N

9. TAXI00 - COMPLIANCE
149.00* 149.00*
OPERATING TAX 10,613,723A 10,668,773A

10 TAXI03 - TAX COLLECTION SERVICES OFFICE
43.00* 43.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING TAX 3,427,288A 3,427,288A

11 TAX105 - TAX SERVICES AND PROCESSING
129.00* 129.00*
OPERATING TAX 7,116,185A 7,116,185A

12 TAX107 - SUPPORTING SERVICES - REVENUE COLLECTION
86.00* 87.00*
7.00# 7.00#
OPERATING 18,MS3,2G4A ^TAX
15.00# 15.00#
TAX 3,629,626B 3,629,626B

13. AGSIOI - ACCOUNTING SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT AND MAINTENANCE
22.00* 22.00*
OPERATING AGS 10,964,409A 8,431,323A

14. AGS102 - EXPENDITURE EXAMINATION
18.00* 18.00*
OPERATING AGS 1,628,950A 1,629,046A

15. AGS103 - RECORDING AND REPORTING
13.00* 13.00*
OPERATING AGS 1,386,549A 1,387,165A

16. AGS104 - INTERNAL POST AUDIT
7.00* 7.00*
3.00# 3.00#
OPERATING AGS 1,023,968A 1,025,751A

17. BUF115 - FINANCIAL ADMINISTRATION
18.00* 18.00*
OPERATING BUF 2,870,681A 2,867,681A
HB300 CDl FIN 46

Page 47
H.B. NO. -1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
9.00* 9.00*
BUF 15,957,630T 15,957,630T

18. BUF721 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - STATE
OPERATING BUF 668,429,515A 605,294,407A

19. ATGIOO - LEGAL SERVICES
321.74* 321.74*
18.67# 18.67#
OPERATING ATG 47,212,444A 45,402,026A
32.90* 32.90*
1.00# 1.00#
ATG 6,484,008B 6,542,845B
5.23# 5.23#
ATG 11,641,670N 11,641,670N
1.00* 1.00*
ATG 4,065,177T 4,065,177T
111. 60* 111.60*
17.10# 17.10#
ATG 21,765,719U 21,765,719U
5.60* 5.60*
2.00# 2.00#
ATG 3,539,882W 3,539,882W
21.44* 21.44*
0.50# 0.50#
ATG 4,890,531P 5,005,104P

20. AGS131 - ENTERPRISE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES
138.00* 138.00* (2
OPERATING t-OfcA AGS LI 52,238,80^ S'l,G^8,^a3A
12.00* 12.00*
1 .00# 1 .00#
AGS 2,578,244B 2,578,244B
33.00* 33.00*
AGS 6,315,295U 6,315,295U
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 4,000,OOOC 2,000,OOOC

21. AGSlll - ARCHIVES - RECORDS MANAGEMENT
19.00* 19.00*
1.00# 1 . 00#
OPERATING AGS 4,383,125A 6,469,149A
3.00* 3.00*
AGS 521,304B 521,304B
2.00# 2.00#
IIB300 GDI FIN

Page 48
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

22. AGS891 - ENHANCED 911 BOARD
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING AGS 14,035,349B 14,035,349B

23. HRD102 - WORKFORCE ATTRACTION, SELECTION, CLASSIFICATION, AND
EFFECTIVENESS
89.00* 89.00*
OPERATING HRD 28,276,844A 27,649,629A
HRD 700,000B 700,000B
2.00* 2.00*
HRD 5,178,161U 5,178,161U

24. HRD191 - SUPPORTING SERVICES - HUMAN RESOURCES DEVELOPMENT
12.00* 12.00*
OPERATING HRD 2,897,063A 2,750,816A

25. BUF141 - EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM
117.00* 117.00*
OPERATING BUF 30,773,357X 25,727,960X

26. BUF143 - HAWAII EMPLOYER UNION TRUST FUND
63.00* 63.00*
OPERATING BUF 11,193,297T ll,337,016T

27. AGS234 - CENTRAL SERVICES - CEMETERY MANAGEMENT OFFICE
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING AGS l,088,500A. l,167,000A

28. BUF741 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - STATE
OPERATING BUF 512,718,644A 522,870,219A
BUF 4,000,000U 4,000,000U

29. BUF761 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - STATE
OPERATING BUF 158,214,808A 161,379,104A

30. BUF762 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENT FOR ANNUAL REQUIRED CONTRIBUTION
(ARC).
OPERATING BUF 838,506,000A 846,891,000A

31. LNRIOI - PUBLIC LANDS MANAGEMENT
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING LNR 177,872A 177,872A
63.00* 63.00*
HB300 GDI FIN 48

Page 49 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNR 24,483,6078 22,983,6078
INVESTMENT CAPITAL LNR 3,200,0008 8
LNR 3,355,000C C

32. AGS203 -- STATE RISK MANAGEMENT AND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION
OPERATING AGS 26,987,995A 26,987,995A
5.00* 5.00*
AGS 25,701,949W 25,706,793W

33. AGS211 - ■ LAND SURVEY
10.00* 10.00*
OPERATING AGS 913,342A 914,121A
AGS 285,000U 285,000U

34. AGS223 - ■ OFFICE LEASING
8.00* 8.00*
OPERATING AGS 7,177,674A 7,178,040A
AGS 5,500,000U 5,500,000U

35. LNR102 - LEGACY LAND CONSERVATION PROGRAM
2.00* 2.00*
OPERATING LNR 9,034,7848 9,034,7848

36. AGS221 - PUBLIC WORKS - PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION
91.00* 91.00*
OPERATING AGS 8,105,782A 8,112,911A
AGS 4,000,000W 4,000,000W
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 24,004,000C 4,000C

37. AGS231 - CENTRAL SERVICES - CUSTODIAL SERVICES
125.00* 126.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING AGS 25,792,541A 25,844,638A
AGS l,699,084U l,699,084U

38. AGS232 - CENTRAL SERVICES - GROUNDS MAINTENANCE
32.00* 32.00*
OPERATING AGS 2,669,822A 2,669,822A

39. AGS233 - CENTRAL SERVICES - BUILDING REPAIRS AND ALTERATIONS
33.00* 33.00*
OPERATING AGS 3,692,561A 3,693,069A

40. AGS240 - STATE PROCUREMENT
HB300 CDl FIN
iniiHiiH

Page 50 H.B. NO. g]
C.D. 1
PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
APPROPRIATIONS
FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROG. EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. ID PROGRAM AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
25.00* 25.00*
1.00# 1.00#
OPERATING AGS 2,203,297A 2,205,274A

41. AGS244 - SURPLUS PROPERTY MANAGEMENT
5.00* 5.00*
OPERATING AGS 2,006,599W 2,006,803W

42. AGS251 - AUTOMOTIVE MANAGEMENT - MOTOR POOL
13.00* 13.00*
OPERATING AGS 3,541,577W 3,539,054W

43. AGS252 - AUTOMOTIVE MANAGEMENT - PARKING CONTROL
27.00* 27.00*
OPERATING AGS 4,563,614W 4,561,089W

44. AGS901 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
54.00* 54.00*
2.00# 2.00#
OPERATING AGS 5,905,937A 5,904,935A
INVESTMENT CAPITAL AGS 35,000,000C C

45. SUB201 - CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU
INVESTMENT CAPITAL CCH 2,000,000c C
CCH 8,000,0005 3

46. SUB301 - COUNTY OF HAWAII
INVESTMENT CAPITAL COH 3,500,000C C
COH 3,500,0003 3

47. SUB501 - COUNTY OF KAUAI
INVESTMENT CAPITAL COK 13,000,000C C
COK 13,000,0003 S



HB300 CDl FIN 50

Page 51
H.B. NO. 'S;
h
C.D. 1
PART III. PROGRAM APPROPRIATION PROVISIONS
SECTION 4. Provided that of the general fund
appropriations for debt service payments (BUF721-BUF728) for
fiscal biennium 2025-2027, balances that are unrequired for debt
service payments may be used to pay for expenses related to
section 39-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and for costs of bond
issuance, or may be transferred to retirement benefits payments
(BUF741-BUF748) and health premium payments (BUF761-BUF768);
provided further that the funds shall not be expended for any
other purpose; and provided further that any unexpended funds
shall lapse to the general fund at the end of the respective
fiscal year for which the appropriation was made.
SECTION 5. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
for the Hawaii technology development corporation (BED143), the
sum of $1,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for
fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for
manufacturing assistance program grants in alignment with
regional economic development and opportunities; provided
further that the Hawaii technology development corporation shall
submit a report of all grant awardees, including the amounts
HB300 CDl FIN

Page 52
H.B. NO. ^.1
C.D. 1
awarded, alignment to regional economic development and
statewide initiatives, and resulting impacts, to the legislature
no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular
session of 2026; provided further that any funds not expended or
encumbered for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund at
the end of each fiscal year.
SECTION 6. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
for the Hawaii technology development corporation (BED143), the
sum of $1,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for
fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for
small business innovation research phase II and phase III
matching grants in alignment with regional economic development
and opportunities; provided further that the Hawaii technology
development corporation shall submit a reportof all grant
awardees, including the amounts awarded, alignment to regional
economic development and statewide initiatives, and resulting
impacts, to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to
the convening of the regular session of 2026; provided further
that any funds not expended or encumbered for this purpose shall
lapse to the general fund at the end of each fiscal year.
HB300 CDl FIN 52
iiiniiiiiiiini

Page 53 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 7. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
for the Hawaii technology development corporation (BED143), the
sum of $1,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for
fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for
accelerator program grants in alignment with regional economic
development and opportunities; provided further that the Hawaii
technology development corporation shall submit a report of all
grant awardees, including the amounts awarded, alignment to
regional economic development and statewide initiatives, and
resulting impacts, to the legislature no later than thirty days
prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026; provided
further that any funds not expended or encumbered for this
purpose shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each
fiscal year.
SECTION 8. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
for strategic marketing and support (BEDIOO), the sum of
$865,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be
necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for the
made in Hawaii workforce development program in accordance with
HB300 CDl FIN
Hiiiiiiin

II i-*^ ।
Page 54 300
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
section 486-119, Hawaii Revised Statutes; provided further that
the department of business, economic development, and tourism
shall submit a report to the legislature no later than thirty
days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026, that
shall include but not be limited to the number of new companies
assisted at local events and shows, number of new to export
companies for both domestic and international exports, number of
market expansion companies that are expanding into a new region
or country market, aggregate actual sales of companies assisted
at consumer shows or at local, domestic, and international trade
shows, aggregate projected sales anticipated within twelve to
eighteen months after an export activity, aggregate number of
jobs generated or supported as a result of assistance, and
economic impact from assistance provided; provided further that
any funds not expended or encumbered for this purpose shall
lapse to the general fund at the end of each fiscal year.
SECTION 9. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
for the office of the governor (GOVlOO), the sum of $4,551,872
or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026
and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for
fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be for the office of the governor;
HB300 CDl FIN 54
niiHiiM

Page 55 H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
provided further that the governor submits the supplemental
budget to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the
convening of the regular session of 2026 in accordance with
section 37-72, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as prescribed by the
legislature.
SECTION 10. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
for agricultural resource management (AGR141), the sum of
$2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2025-2026 shall be deposited into the irrigation system
revolving fund, to be expended for irrigation related expenses
pursuant to section 167-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
SECTION 11. Provided that of the general fund
appropriation for departmental administration and budget
division (BUFlOl), the sum of $1,011,564 or so much thereof as
may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 shall be expended for
salary adjustments as recommended by the commission on salaries;
provided that the governor may transfer funds between
departments and programs to implement any salary adjustments as
recommended by the commission on salaries.
SECTION 12. Provided that of the general fund
appropriation for school support (EDN400), the sum of $5,000,000
HB300 CDl FIN 55

Page 56 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026
and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for
fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended to contract the
department of law enforcement to improve school safety across
department of education campuses via technology; provided
further that any funds not expended for this purpose shall lapse
to the general fund.

HB300 CDl FIN 56
MWioiiin

Page 57
H.B. NO. g]
C.D. 1
PART IV. GRANT-IN-AID APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 13. APPROPRIATIONS. The legislature finds that
the grant recipients named in this part have applied for a grant
pursuant to section 42F-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and
qualify to receive a grant pursuant to section 42F-103, Hawaii
Revised Statutes.
There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the
State of Hawaii the sum of $10,000,000 or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to the expending agencies
listed in this part and in the sums indicated for the purpose of
providing grants to the corresponding grant recipient.
The appropriations shall be disbursed by a contract between
the named expending agency and the grant recipient pursuant to
sections 42F-104, 42F-105, and 42F-106, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
Further, the legislature finds and declares that the grants are
in the public interest and for the public health, safety, and
general welfare of the State.

HB300 CDl FIN
llililllillllllll

Page 58
H.B. NO. S
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
AMOUNT PROJECT
1. $225,000.00 808 CLEANUPS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR 808 CLEANUPS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
PERSONNEL AND PROGRAMS FOCUSED ON
CONSERVATION PROJECTS IN HAWAII FOR
LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT
(LNR906) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

2. $300,000.00 ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO EDUCATIONAL SUPPORT
SERVICES FOR HIGH-RISK YOUTH FOR IN-
COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS (HMS501) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

3. $115,000.00 AFTER SCHOOL ALL-STARS HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR AFTER SCHOOL ALL-STARS HAWAII, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF AFTER-
SCHOOL TVND SUMMER PROGRAMS FOR TITLE I
SCHOOLS FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION
(EDN300) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

4. $100,000.00 ALALUA LIFE FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ALALUA LIFE FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO A MEMORIAL GARDEN FOR
LAHAINA FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES {LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

5. $140,000.00 ALOHA HARVEST
HB300 CDl FIN 58
■NMiMiH

Page 59 300
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR ALOHA HARVEST, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO FOOD RESCUE AND REDISTRIBUTION FOR
OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

6. $75,000.00 BEST BUDDIES HAWAII, LLC
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR BEST BUDDIES HAWAII, LLC, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO FRIENDSHIP AND
LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT FOR STUDENTS
WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION
(EDN300) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

7. $125,000.00 CATHOLIC CHARITIES HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR CATHOLIC CHARITIES HAWAII, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO EDUCATION,
RECREATION, HEALTH PROMOTION, AND
HEALTH SCREENING FOR SENIORS FOR
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION (HTH907) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

8. $125,000.00 CENTER FOR TOMORROWS LEADERS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR CENTER FOR TOMORROWS LEADERS, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO STRENGTHENING THE
STATE'S WORKFORCE PIPELINE FOR IN­
COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS (HMS501) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

9. $50,000.00 COMMON GRACE
HB300 CDl FIN
MHMMIH

Page 60 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR COMMON GRACE, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
ASSISTING SOCIALLY DISENGAGED YOUTH
WITH ACADEMIC AND BEHAVIORAL
CHALLENGES FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
- DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO
THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

10. $100,000.00 DOWNTOWN ART CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR DOWNTOWN ART CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO ESTABLISHING AN ARTS AND
CULTURE COMMUNITY CENTER IN HONOLULU
FOR STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND
THE ARTS (AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

11. $50,000.00 EPILEPSY FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR EPILEPSY FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO EXPANSION OF EPILEPSY
EDUCATION, ADVOCACY AND SUPPORT
SERVICES STATEWIDE FOR FAMILY HEALTH
SERVICES (HTH560) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

12. $20,000.00 EWA BEACH LIONS CLUB FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR EWA BEACH LIONS CLUB FOUNDATION,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO ANNUAL COMMUNITY
ENRICHMENT EVENTS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

13. $40,000.00 FRIENDS OF CHILDREN'S JUSTICE CENTER
OF EAST HI
HB300 CDl FIN 60
■■■■■I

Page 61 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR FRIENDS OF CHILDREN'S JUSTICE
CENTER OF EAST HI, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO EMERGENCY, SPECIAL NEEDS, AND
ENHANCEMENT SERVICES TO CHILD VICTIMS
OF ABUSE FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION -
DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO
THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

14. $100,000.00 GOVERNOR ARIYOSHI FOUNDATION: GALT
LEADERSHIP TRAINING
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR GOVERNOR ARIYOSHI FOUNDATION: GALT
LEADERSHIP TRAINING, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO ESTABLISHING A LEADERSHIP TRAINING
PROGRAM FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

15. $200,000.00 HALE MAHAOLU
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HALE MiAHAOLU, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
PROVIDING ESSENTIAL WRAP AROUND
SERVICES FOR VULNERABLE POPULATIONS
FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS
(HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

16. $20,000.00 HAMAKUA YOUTH FOUNDATION, INC.
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HTkMAKUA YOUTH FOUNDATION, INC.,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO AFTER SCHOOL
CARE, CULTURAL PROGRAMS, AND
INTERMITTENT FOOD ASSISTANCE FOR IN­
COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS (HMS501) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

HB300 CDl FIN 61
ilUIIIHIIII

Page 62
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
17. $300,000.00 HAWAII AG AND CULINARY ALLIANCE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII AG AND CULINARY ALLIANCE,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT OUTREACH INITIATIVES FOR
AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT AND MARKETING
(AGRI92) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

18. $325,000.00 HAWAII AGRICULTURAL FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII AGRICULTURAL FOUNDATION,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF
AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION, WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT, AND COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT
FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FOR
AGRICULTURE (AGR171) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

19. $100,000.00 HAWAII CONSTRUCTION CAREER DAYS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII CONSTRUCTION CAREER DAYS,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING CAREER
PATHWAYS IN THE CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRY
FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING (EDNIOO)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

20. $125,000.00 HAWAII COUNCIL FOR THE HUMANITIES
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII COUNCIL FOR THE HUM71NITIES,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO DEVELOPMENT OF
RESEARCH-BASED HISTORY CURRICULUM AND
TEACHER RESOURCES AND TRAINING IN
ENGLISH AND HAWAIIAN FOR STATE
ADMINISTRATION {EDN300) ALL EXPENSES
HB300 CDl FIN 62
l■ll■llllln

Page 63 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

21. $350,000.00 HAWAII FARM BUREAU FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII FARM BUREAU FOUNDATION, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH
AND MARKET DEVELOPMENT FOR GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE
(AGR171), ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO
THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

22. $20,000.00 HAWAII HEALTH & HARM REDUCTION CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII HEALTH & HARM REDUCTION
CENTER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO DIRECT
LEGAL ASSISTANCE FOR UNSHELTERED
HOMELESS FOR LEGAL SERVICES (ATGIOO)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

23. $100,000.00 HAWAII ISLAND HUMANE SOCIETY S.P.C.A.
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII ISLAND HUMANE SOCIETY
S.P.C.A., FOR COSTS RELATED TO SPAY
AND NEUTER PROGRAMS FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

24. $40,000.00 HAWAII STATE SCIENCE OLYMPIAD
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII STATE SCIENCE OLYMPIAD, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION AND
ENHANCEMENT OF STATEWIDE STEM
EDUCATION INITIATIVES FOR SCHOOL-BASED
BUDGETING (EDNIOO) ALL EXPENSES
HB300 CDl FIN
■BIIIHilll

Page 64
H.B. NO. “
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

25. $250,000.00 HAWAII SYMPHONY ORCHESTRA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII SYMPHONY ORCHESTRA, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO YOUTH EDUCATION AND
COMMUNITY MUSIC PERFORMANCES FOR STATE
FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS
(AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

26. $50,000.00 HAWAII TAX HELP AND FINANCIAL
EMPOWERMENT SOLUTIONS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HAWAII TAX HELP AND FINANCIAL
EMPOWERMENT SOLUTIONS, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO FREE TAX SERVICES AND TAX
EDUCATION FOR GENERAL SUPPORT FOR
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (BED142) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

27. $100,000.00 HAWAII VOLCANO CIRCUS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
• FOR HAWAII VOLCANO CIRCUS, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO PERFORMANCE, FINE ARTS,
AGRICULTURE, AND TECHNOLOGY EDUCATION
AND DISASTER PREPAREDNESS PLANNING
SERVICES AND TRAINING FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

28. $50,000.00 HELPING HANDS HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HELPING HANDS HAWAII, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO INTERPRETATION AND WRITTEN
HB300 CDl FIN
inilHMIIIIMIII

Page 65 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
TRANSLATION TO LOW-INCOME RESIDENTS
FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
(LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

29. $20,000.00 HOKULANI CHILDREN'S THEATRE OF MOLOKAI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HOKULANI CHILDREN'S THEATRE OF
MOLOKAI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
PERFORMING ARTS PROGRAMS FOR STATE
FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS
(AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

30. $75,000.00 HOOKIPA KAUAI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HOOKIPA KAUAI, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO PURCHASE OF FOOD, HYGIENE, AND
SHELTERING PRODUCTS FOR GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION - DHS (HMS904) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

31. $270,000.00 HOOLA NA PUA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HOOLA NA PUA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
CONTINUUM OF PREVENTION, INTERVENTION,
AND TRAUMA INFORMED, EVIDENCE BASED
SERVICES FOR IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH
PROGRAMS (HMS501) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

32. $75,000.00 HOSPICE OF HILO
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HOSPICE OF HILO, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO INTERDISCIPLINARY PALLIATIVE CARE
TETkM FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS
HB300 CDl FIN 65

Page 66
H.B. NO. J
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

33. $10,000.00 HUA 0 LAHUI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HUA 0 LAHUI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
CANOE CARVING, KOI MAKING, AND
FILMMAKING TARGETING NATIVE HAWAIIAN
VETERANS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

34. $110,000.00 HUI 0 HAUULA
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR HUI 0 HAUULA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
CONTINUATION AND EXPANSION OF AFTER
SCHOOL PROGRAMS, EMERGENCY
PREPARATION, SENIOR SERVICES, FOOD
DISTRIBUTION, AND DIGITAL LITERACY FOR
ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT
(HHL625) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

35. $65,000.00 IBOUNCE UP, INC.
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR IBOUNCE UP, INC., FOR COSTS
RELATED TO MENTAL RESILIENCE TRAINING
SESSIONS FOR AT-RISK AND UNDERSERVED
INDIVIDUALS FOR ADULT MENTAL HEALTH -
OUTPATIENT (HTH420) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

36. $150,000.00 INNOVATIONS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR INNOVATIONS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL
FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
HB300 CDl FIN 66
iiniHiH

Page 67 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ACQUISITION OF FURNITURE, FIXTURES,
AND EQUIPMENT FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION
(EDN300) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

37. $250,000.00 JAPAN-AMERICA SOCIETY OF HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR JAPAN-AMERICA SOCIETY OF HAWAII,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO A HAWAII-JAPAN
SISTER SUMMIT FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

8. $200,000.00 KALIHI COMMUNITY CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KALIHI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO CULTURAL ASSISTANCE AND
LEADERSHIP BUILDING FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

39. $40,000.00 KAPULE ORGANIZATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KAPULE ORGANIZATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO EDUCATIONAL NATURE
EXPLORATIONS, FISHPOND RESTORATION,
AND NATIVE HAWAIIAN CANOE SAILING FOR
HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS FOR ECOSYSTEM
PROTECTION AND RESTORATION (LNR401)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

40. $75,000.00 KAUAI FOODBANK, INC., THE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE KAUAI FOODBANK, INC., FOR
COSTS RELATED TO VARIOUS FOOD
DISTRIBUTION PROGRAMS TARGETING
HB300 GDI FIN 67
■iniiniig

Page 68 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SENIORS AND CHILDREN FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

41. $375,000.00 KOOLAULOA HEALTH CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KOOLAULOA HEALTH CENTER, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO OPERATIONS OF A HEALTH
CENTER FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
(HTH907) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

42. $175,000.00 KUALOA-HEEIA ECUMENICAL YOUTH PROJECT
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR KUALOA-HEEIA ECUMENICAL YOUTH
PROJECT, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
EXPANSION OF A CULTURALLY GROUNDED
YOUTH PROGRAM FOR ADMINISTRATION AND
OPERATING SUPPORT (HHL625) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

43. $185,000.00 KUMANO I KE ALA 0 MAKAWELI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
KUMANO I KE ALA 0 MAKAWELI, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO EDUCATION IN NATIVE
HAWAIIAN FOOD CROPS, LAND MANAGEMENT,
AND MITIGATION OF EROSION FOR
ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT
(HHL625) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

44. $25,000.00 LANAI ACADEMY OF PERFORMING ARTS, INC.
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR LANAI ACADEMY OF PERFORMING ARTS,
INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO A
PERFORMING ARTS PROGRAM OFFERING ART
HB300 CDl FIN 68
UinMM

Page 69
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CLASSES, MUSIC PRODUCTION, AND
PERFORMING ART CAMPS FOR STATE
FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS
(AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

45. $75,000.00 LEGAL CLINIC, THE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE LEGAL CLINIC, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO IN-STATE JOB TRAINING
PROGRAMS AND IMMIGRATION LAW CAPACITY
FOR LEGAL SERVICES (ATGIOO) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

46. $200,000.00 LEILEHUA ALUMNI AND COMMUNITY
ASSOCIATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR LEILEHUA ALUMNI AND COMMUNITY
ASSOCIATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
DEVELOPMENT OF AGRICULTURAL,
AGRICULTURAL TECHNOLOGY, AND
AGRICULTURAL ENTREPRENEURSHIP PROGRTkMS
FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS IN THE
LEILEHUA COMPLEX FOR SCHOOL-BASED
BUDGETING (EDNlOO) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

47. $150,000.00 MAUI ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BOARD, INC.
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MAUI ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BOARD,
INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROGRAMS
THAT PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT,
INTERNSHIPS, CAREER AWARENESS
OPPORTUNITIES, EXTRACURRICULAR
ACTIVITIES, AND IN-CLASSROOM SUPPORT
TO PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENTS AND TEACHERS
STATEWIDE FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING
HB300 CDl FIN 69
IIIHMIilMII

Page 70
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(EDNIOO) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

48. $375,000.00 MOILIILI COMMUNITY CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR MOILIILI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO SUSTAIN ESSENTIAL
COMMUNITY CENTER PROGRAMS AND
OPERATIONS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
PROVIDED THAT NO FUNDS SHALL BE USED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE MOILIILI
COMMUNITY CENTER JAPANESE LANGUAGE
SCHOOL, IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE X,
SECTION 1, OF THE HAWAII STATE
CONSTITUTION; AND

49. $100,000.00 NA WAHINE PAANI 0 PUNAHOU
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR NA WAHINE PAANI 0 PUNAHOU, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO OPERATIONS OF AN ALL­
GIRL HIGH SCHOOL WRESTLING TOURNAMENT
FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION (EDN300) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

50. $100,000.00 OAHU RESOURCE CONSERVATION AND
DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR OAHU RESOURCE CONSERVATION AND
DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO OPERATION OF POP-UP LABS FOR STEM
FOR SCHOOLS AND YOUTH ORGANIZATIONS
FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING (EDNIOO)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

51. $250,000.00 OCEANIT RESEARCH FOUNDATION
HB300 CDl FIN 70
■illMID

Page 71
H.B. NO. " ’
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR OCEANIT RESEARCH FOUNDATION, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO A PROJECT TO RESTORE
A BALANCED COASTAL ECOSYSTEM IN
MANTOKUJI BAY FOR HAWAII TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION (BED143) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

52. $100,000.00 OHANA ARTS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR OHANA ARTS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
TRANSPORTATION COSTS FOR YOUTH TOURING
CAST PERFORMANCES FOR STATE FOUNDATION
ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS (AGS881) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

53. $150,000.00 PACIFIC BIRTH COLLECTIVE INCORPORATED
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PACIFIC BIRTH COLLECTIVE
INCORPORATED, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
PROVIDING FINTkNCIAL ASSISTANCE TO
INDIVIDUALS PURSUING LICENSURE AS A
CERTIFIED MIDWIFE FOR GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION (HTH907) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

54. $175,000.00 PACIFIC INTERNATIONAL CENTER FOR HIGH
TECHNOLOGY RESEARCH
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PACIFIC INTERNATIONAL CENTER FOR
HIGH TECHNOLOGY RESEARCH, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO THE ANNUAL US-JAPAN COUNCIL
ANNUAL CONFERENCE FOR GENERAL SUPPORT
FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (BEDI42) ALL
HB300 CDl FIN

Page 72 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

55. $150,000.00 PACIFIC TSUN7VMI MUSEUM, INC.
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PACIFIC TSUNAMI MUSEUM, INC., FOR
COSTS RELATED TO TSUNAMI PREPAREDNESS
THROUGH MUSEUM EDUCATION AND COMMUNITY
OUTREACH FOR AMELIORATION OF PHYSICAL
DISASTERS (DEFllO) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

56. $55,000.00 PARENTS AND CHILDREN TOGETHER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR PARENTS AND CHILDREN TOGETHER, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO PROTECTION OF VICTIMS
OF FAMILY VIOLENCE FOR FAMILY HEALTH
SERVICES (HTH560) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

57. $200,000.00 RESCUE TUBE FOUNDATION, THE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE RESCUE TUBE FOUNDATION, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF
DEPLOYMENT AND BUILDING OF
SUSTAINABILITY FOR PUBLIC RESCUE TUBES
FOR LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL
ENVIRONMENT (LNR906) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

58. $50,000.00 RISEHI
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR RISEHI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
EXPANSION OF MENTORSHIP PROGRAMS FOR
STUDENTS STATEWIDE FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
HB300 CDl FIN
■llllllllill

Page 73 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

59. $300,000.00 SEARIDER PRODUCTIONS FOUNDATION
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR SEARIDER PRODUCTIONS FOUNDATION,
FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING
ACTIVITIES AND OPPORTUNITIES TO
LEEWARD COAST STUDENTS FOCUSING ON
HEALTHY LIVING, MAINTAINING A POSITIVE
ATTITUDE, AND SAFETY FOR SCHOOL-BASED
BUDGETING (EDNIOO)) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

60. $200,000.00 SURFRIDER SPIRIT SESSIONS
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR SURFRIDER SPIRIT SESSIONS, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING CULTURALLY
RELEVANT, HIGH VALUE PROGRAMS FOR AT-
RISK YOUTH TO OVERCOME TRAUMA, BUILD
RESILIENCE, AND PROMOTE POSITIVE
DEVELOPMENT FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
- DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO
THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

61. $170,000.00 SUSTAINABLE COASTLINES HAWAII
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR SUSTAINABLE COASTLINES HAWAII, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO ONGOING COASTAL AND
MAUKA STEWARDSHIP, LEARNING COHORTS,
AND EDUCATIONAL SERVICES RELATED TO
RESOURCE RECOVERY AND SUSTAINABILITY
FOR LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL
ENVIRONMENT (LNR906) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

HB300 CDl FIN
IIIIIIIHIIIII

Page 74 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
62. $200,000.00 UNITED KOREAN ASSOCIATION OF HAWAII,
THE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE UNITED KOREAN ASSOCIATION OF
HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO OPERATING
A CULTURAL COMMUNITY CENTER FOR OFFICE
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

63. $200,000.00 WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH,
THE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY
HEALTH, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING
PRIMARY CARE, MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES,
SUBSTANCE ABUSE DISORDER TREATMENT,
AND SOCIAL SERVICES IN WAIALUA,
MOKULEIA, AND KAENA POINT FOR FAMILY
HEALTH SERVICES (HTH560) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

64. $250,000.00 WAIANAE DISTRICT COMPREHENSIVE HEALTH
AND HOSPITAL BOARD, INCORPORATED
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIANAE DISTRICT COMPREHENSIVE
HEALTH AND HOSPITAL BOARD,
INCORPORATED, FOR COSTS RELATED TO
SECURITY STAFFING, STAFF EMERGENCY
SCENARIO TRAINING, AND EXPANSION OF
SURVEILLANCE AND MONITORING SYSTEMS
FOR FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES (HTH560)
ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

65. $400,000.00 WAIKIKI BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
ASSOCIATION
HB300 CDl FIN
■■niuiffl

Page 75 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIKIKI BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICT ASSOCIATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO AN AMBASSADOR PROGRAM
PROVIDING CUSTODIAL SERVICES, SAFETY
AND SECURITY, HOSPITALITY SERVICES,
AND SUPPORT FOR MENTALLY ILL AND
HOMELESS INDIVIDUALS IN WAIKIKI FOR
GENERAL SUPPORT FOR ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT (BED142) ALL EXPENSES
RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS;
AND

66. $75,000.00 WAIKIKI COMMUNITY CENTER
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WAIKIKI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR
COSTS RELATED TO EVIDENCE-BASED
WELLNESS ACTIVITIES AND PERSONALIZED
RESOURCE NAVIGATION FOR SENIORS FOR
GENERAL ADMINISTRATION (HTH907) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

67. $80,000.00 WAIPA FOUNDATION, THE
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR THE WAIPA FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS
RELATED TO UPGRADE OF KITCHEN
FACILITIES, SUSTAIN OPERATIONAL STAFF,
AND CONDUCT A PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT
OF THE FACILITIES' OVERALL CONDITION
AND FUNCTIONALITY FOR OFFICE OF
COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL
EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION
OF FUNDS; AND

68. $200,000.00 WEED AND SEED HAWAII, INC.
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR WEED AND SEED HAWAII, INC., FOR
HB300 CDl FIN 75

Page 76
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
COSTS RELATED TO STAFFING, TRAINING,
AND ACTIVITIES IN COMMUNITIES WITH A
HISTORY OF HIGH LEVELS OF CRIME, DRUG
USE, VIOLENCE, AND SEVERE ECONOMIC
DETERIORATION FOR LEGAL SERVICES
(ATGIOO) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR
APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND

69. $100,000.00 YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF
OAHU
ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES,
FOR YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN
ASSOCIATION OF OAHU, FOR COSTS RELATED
TO OPERATIONS OF EMPLOYMENT SUPPORT
SERVICES FOR WOMEN EXPERIENCING
ECONOMIC, EDUCATIONAL, AND EMOTIONAL
INSTABILITY FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY
SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED
TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS.

HB300 CDl FIN
inniiiiiiiHiii

Page 77 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PART V, CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
SECTION 14. CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS AUTHORIZED. The
sums appropriated or authorized in part II of this Act for
capital improvements shall be expended for the projects listed
below. Accounting of the appropriations by the department of
accounting and general services shall be based on the projects
as such projects are listed in this section. Several related or
similar projects may be combined into a single project if such
combination is advantageous or convenient for implementation;
and provided further that the total cost of the projects thus
combined shall not exceed the total of the sum specified for the
projects separately. The amount after each cost element and the
total funding for each project listed in this part are in
thousands of dollars.

HB300 CDl FIN 77

Page 78 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F

A. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
BEDI01 - OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS

1. EAST-WEST CENTER, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO RENOVATE, IMPROVE, AND
MODERNIZE EAST-WEST CENTER BUILDINGS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 5, 000 C

BED113 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - ADMINISTRATION AND GOVERNANCE

2. HAWAII CONVENTION CENTER
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE HAWAII
CONVENTION CENTER.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 36,400C

AGRI32 - ANIMAL DISEASE CONTROL

3. HALAWA ANIMAL INDUSTRY FACILITY
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE
ANIMAL INDUSTRY FACILITY IN HALAWA.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 7,000C


HB300 GDI FIN 78
mmiiiii

Page 79 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
' S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
AGRI 41 - AGRICULTURAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT

4 . STATE IRRIGATION SYSTEM RESERVOIR
SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR THE STATE IRRIGATION
SYSTEM RESERVOIR SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING AGR 5, 000 C C
AGR 1 N N

AGRI 92 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE

5. MISCELLANEOUS HEALTH, SAFETY, CODE,
AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO ADDRESS HEALTH, SAFETY,
CODE, AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 1,900 C 2,200 C

BED170 - AGRIBUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND RESEARCH

6. ACQUISITION OF AGRICULTURAL LANDS,
KAPAIA, KAUAI

LAND ACQUISITION FROM GROVE FARM ON
KAUAI.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 39,000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 79
■iiiHniinmiiii

. 300
H R NC
H.D. 1
■ ■ ■
" S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7 • ACQUISITION OF AGRICULTURAL LANDS,
WAIMEA, KAUAI

LAND ACQUISITION FOR AGRICULTURAL
LANDS ON KAUAI, TMKS: 1-6-001-045, 1-6-
001-030, AND 1-6-001-028.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 1,300 C C

8 • AGRICULTURAL INFRASTRUCTURE
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO
AGRICULTURAL INFRASTRUCTURE IN WAHIAWA
AND WAIALUA, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 9, 200 C c

9 ANIMAL PROCESSING AND STORAGE
FACILITY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHINGS FOR A
dedicated small animal PROCESSING AND
STORAGE FACILITY ON OAHU TO SUPPORT POST­
SLAUGHTER HANDLING. THIS FACILITY WILL
INCLUDE AREAS FOR CARCASS BREAKDOWN, MEAT
CUTTING, PACKAGING, CHILLING, AND COLD
STORAGE TO EXPAND LOCAL CAPACITY FOR
SAFE, HIGH-QUALITY MEAT PROCESSING. THE
PROJECT WILL SERVE SMALL- AND MID-SIZED
PRODUCERS, IMPROVE LOCAL FOOD SYSTEM
INFRASTRUCTURE, AND ENHANCE THE
AVAILABILITY OF HAWAII-GROWN MEAT FOR
CONSUMERS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 17,000 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 80
■■mill

Page 81
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
10. COtdMERCIAL LAND PURCHASE, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION OF COMMERCIAL LAND
ON OAHU, TMK 7-1-006-001.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 500 C 4,500 C

11. CONSTRUCTION FOR A STATE POSTHARVEST
FACILITY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A POSTHARVEST FACILITY ON
OAHU, TMKs 7-1-002:004 (por.); 009
(por.); 023 (por.).
TOTAL FUNDING BED 22,076 C C

12. FOOD AND PRODUCT INNOVATION NETWORK
(FPIN), STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, LAND ACQUISITION, AND
FURNISHINGS FOR A FOOD AND PRODUCT
INNOVATION NETWORK, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 350 C C

13. FOOD PROCESSING PLANT, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN,
EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHING FOR A FOOD
PROCESSING PLANT, OAHU, TMKs 7-4-005-032
and 7-4-005-018.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 6,275 C 650 C

14. IRRIGATION SYSTEM, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, LAND ACQUISITION,
REHABILITATION, AND EXPANSION COSTS FOR
AN AGRICULTURAL IRRIGATION SYSTEM,
WAHIAWA, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2, 000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 81
IHilllNIlIIIIII

Page 82 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
15. PURCHASE OF LAND LOCKED BETWEEN
STATE-OWNED LAND, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION FOR AGRICULTURAL
LANDS ON OAHU, TMK 6-5-002-027.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 3, 0 00 C C

16. SMALL ANIMAL SLAUGHTERHOUSE, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND FURNISHING EQUIPMENT
FOR A SMALL ANIMAL SLAUGHTERHOUSE.
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, EQUIPMENT,
AND APPURTENANCES, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 4,000C C

17. WAIAHOLE WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS,
OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE
WAIAHOLE WATER SYSTEM AND APPURTENANT
WORKS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2,500C C

18. WASTEWATER RECLAIMED WATER IRRIGATION
SYSTEM, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A WASTEWATER RECLAIMED
WATER IRRIGATION SYSTEM AND INTAKE PUMP
STATION, WAHIAWA, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 4,000C C


HB300 GDI FIN 82
IIIIHIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 83
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNRl41 - WATER AND LAND DEVELOPMENT

19. ROCKFALL AND FLOOD MITIGATION,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ROCKFALL
AND FLOOD MITIGATION AT VARIOUS
LOCATIONS, STATEWIDE. THE LEGISLATURE
FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE APPROPRIATION
IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST AND FOR THE
PUBLIC'S HEALTH, SAFETY AND GENERAL
WELFARE OF THE STATE.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,000 C c

BED150 - HAWAII COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY

20. 99-YEAR LEASEHOLD PROGRAM, PHASE 2,
OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A LEASEHOLD CONDOMINIUM
FACILITY UNDER THE 99-YEAR LEASEHOLD
PROGRTkM, LOCATED AT TMKs 2-1-049-080 AND
2-1-049-063.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 15,000 C c

21. CLIMATE CHANGE IMPACT ASSESSMENT,
OAHU

PLANS TO CONDUCT AN ASSESSMENT AND
RULEMAKING TO CONSIDER THE IMPACTS OF
CLIMATE CHANGE AND SEA LEVEL RISE FOR THE
DEVELOPMENT IN HCDA'S KAKAAKO AND
KALAELOA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2,000 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 83
IWIIIHIIIIIi

Page 84 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
CD. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
-hMW^Al\04«'000\0-i>MWX41U\0^-000\0-hJbWki4«/(\OQ'00©>'0-h»>ti»t^l/t\0^-00«' 22. IWILEI-KAPALAMA COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, OAHU
DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF
INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS TO SUPPORT
IWILEI-KAPALAMA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 12,000C C
23. KAKAAKO MAKAI GEOTECHNICAL
ASSESSMENT, OAHU
RESEARCH PAST STUDIES AND CONDUCT
GEOTECHNICAL SURVEY OF CONTAMINATED MAKAI
LANDS.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 1,500C C
. KAKAAKO MAKAI PLANNING, OAHU
PLANS FOR AN INFRASTRUCTURE
ASSESSMENT AND COMMUNITY PLANNING FOR
KAKAAKO MAKAI.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 1,000C C
25. KALAELOA INFRASTRUCTURE-EIS DISTRICT
WIDE, KALAELOA, OAHU
PLANS FOR PROGRAMMATIC ENVIRONMENTAL
IMPACT STATEMENT FOR THE KALAELOA
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 1,000C C
26. KUPUNA SUPPORTIVE HOUSING, OAHU
PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF
KUPUNA SUPPORTIVE HOUSING, LOCATED AT TMK
2-1-030-012.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 5,500C 29,450C
HB300 GDI FIN 84
iiiiiiniiiiiiM

Page 85 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
BED160 - HAWAII HOUSING FINANCE AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION

27. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION
OF FUNDS TO FINANCE ADDITIONAL AFFORDABLE
RENTAL HOUSING, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 50,000 C 50,000 c

28. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND, TIER II, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION
OF FUNDS TO FINANCE RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND TIER II AFFORDABLE RENTAL
HOUSING, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 50,000 C 50,000 c

29. DWELLING UNIT REVOLVING FUND
INFUSION, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION
OF FUNDS TO FINANCE ADDITIONAL AFFORDABLE
HOUSING, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED C 40,000 c


HB300 GDI FIN 85
■■niMn

Page 86 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
B. EMPLOYMENT
LBR903 - OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES

1 . 442ND LEGACY CENTER

CONSTRUCTION FOR COMPLETION OF
MUSEUM. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c

2 . ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH

LAND ACQUISITION FOR HIGH-RISK YOUTH
REDIRECTIONAL THERAPY. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c

3. ALCOHOLIC REHABILITATION SERVICES OF
HAWAII, INC., THE

CONSTRUCTION FOR INSTALLATION OF
SOLAR PANELS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c

4 . ARC OF HILO, THE

LAND ACQUISITION FOR REDIRECTIONAL
THERAPY FOR HIGH-RISK YOUTH. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 86

Page 87
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
5 ARC OF MAUI COUNTY

CONSTRUCTION AND LAND ACQUISITION FOR
SAFE AND ACCESSIBLE ENVIRONMENT FOR
INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND
DEVELOPMENT DISABILITIES, AND ELECTRICAL
UPGRADES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42P, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 200 C c

6 BACK TO THE BEGINNING, INC.

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
BUILDING OF RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c

7 BLOOD BANK OF HAWAII

EQUIPMENT FOR BLOODMOBILE VEHICLE.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C c

8 • BOYS AND GIRLS CLUB OF HAWAII

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
CLUBHOUSE REPAIRS ON OAHU AND KAUAI. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 87
HnniinH

Page 88 H.B. NO. ™ i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
*-*MM^im\ou-ooo\o^-i>st>uu>nLsoj'eoo'o^H>>tM^nt\9^ooo'o^iJbiu>a4nt
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
9. DIGS
DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT, AND
LAND ACQUISITION FOR PROCUREMENT AND
CONSTRUCTION OF AN AFFORDABLE CENTER ON
OAHU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C c
10. ELEPAIO SOCIAL SERVICES
PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
DEVELOPMENT OF A COMMUNITY RESILIENCE
FACILITY. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C c
11. EPISCOPAL CHURCH IN HAWAII, THE
CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF A
COMMUNITY CENTER IN KAPOLEI. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 480 C c
12. FILIPINO COMMUNITY CENTER INC., THE
CONSTRUCTION FOR SECURITY, SAFETY,
AND FACILITY INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS,
AND LANDSCAPE REHABILITATION. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 250 C c
HB300 CDl FIN 88
iiiniininiiin

Page 89 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
13. FIVE MOUNTAINS HAWAII, INC.

CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF A
RURAL HEALTH CLINIC ON HAWAII ISLAND.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 200 C c

14 . FRIENDS OF THE SUNSET MEMORIAL
CEMETERY

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAUSOLEUM
RENOVATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 150 C c

15. GREGORY HOUSE PROGRAMS

PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR AND
IMPROVEMENTS TO A TRANSITIONAL HOUSING
FACILITY ON OAHU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c

16. HABITAT FOR HUMANITY INTERNATIONAL,
INC. (HONOLULU)

CONSTRUCTION FOR A HOME REPAIR
REVOLVING FUND PROGRAM ON OAHU. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 175 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 89
iiiiHiiinii

Page 90 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
17. HALE OPIO KAUAI, INC.

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF TWO
RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT HOMES IN LAWAI AND
KAPAHI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 168 C c

18 . HANA HEALTH

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTIONS FOR
CONSTRUCTION OF A SPECIALTY MEDICAL AND
DENTAL FACILITY. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C c

19. HAWAII FOODBANK, INC.

PLANS, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR SOLAR PANEL INSTALLATION. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 800 C c

20. HAWAII ISLAND VETERANS MEMORIAL'

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
RENOVATIONS OF ADULT DAY HEALTH HALLWAYS,
CLASSROOMS, AND MEETING AREAS. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 175 C c

21. HAWAII THEATRE CENTER

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
BUILDING RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 150 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 90
iiiiiiiiinii

Page 91
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
22. HAWAII UNITED OKINAWA ASSOCIATION

CONSTRUCTION AND LAND ACQUISITION FOR
THE PURCHASE OF LAND AND ELECTRICAL
UPGRADES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c

23. HIIPAKA, LLC

CONSTRUCTION FOR A CULTURAL TRAINING
AND EDUCATION CENTER. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c

24. HILO BAYFRONT TRAILS, INC.

CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR SAFETY
REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 120 C c

25. HOLUALOA FOUNDATION FOR ARTS &
CULTURE

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR MASTER CAMPUS
PLAN DEVELOPMENT TO RENOVATE AND UPGRADE
EXISTING FACILITIES. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c


HB300 CDl FIN
IIMIIII■III■III

Page 92 H.B. NO. “

C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
—iM^u^JiUso^-oo^o‘^>KJu.iji/t\o^eoo\o^jbW.«ijnc\oj--eao\0‘ >
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
26. HOMESTEAD COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION
DESIGN FOR DEVELOPMENT OF A HAWAIIAN
HOMESTEAD MULTI-PURPOSE CENTER IN SOUTH
HILO. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 350 C C
27. HOOULU LAHUI
LAND ACQUISITION FOR ACQUISITION OF A
PROPERTY FOR PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL IN
PUNA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C c
. HUI MALAMA 0 KANEIOLOUMA
CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR
RESTORATION OF ANCIENT HAWAIIAN VILLAGE
ON KAUAI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c
29. INSPIRATION HAWAII MUSEUM, INC.
PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REPAIR AND RENOVATION OF
RESTROOMS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 311 C c
HB300 CDl FIN 92
niniiwiHii

Page 93
H.B. NO. g i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
30. ISLAND OF HAWAII YMCA, THE

DESIGN FOR DESIGN OF NEW COMMUNITY
CENTER PROJECT ON HAWAII ISLAND. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c

31. JAPANESE CULTURAL CENTER OF HAWAII

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF
HISTORICAL HERITAGE EXHIBIT ON OAHU. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c

32. KALIHI-PALTiMA HEALTH CENTER (HALE
HOOLA HOU)

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF
BATHROOM, NEW ALARM, NEW AIR
CONDITIONING, AND REPLACEMENT OF DENTAL
EQUIPMENT. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 350 C c

33. KAUAI ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
INCORPORATED

CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR OF HOMELESS
SHELTER PROPERTIES. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 93
iiiiiiiininni

Page 94
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
34. KAUAI FOODBANK, INC., THE

CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR OF WAREHOUSE
IN LIHUE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 116 C c

35. LAI OPUA 2020

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
COMPLETION OF COMMUNITY COMPLEX IN
KEALAKEHE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 300 C c

36. LANAKILA PACIFIC

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR AIR CONDITIONING
REPLACEMENT. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C c

37 . MAKIKI CHRISTIAN CHURCH

CONSTRUCTION FOR RE-ROOFING OF TOWER
AND SOCIAL HALL. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 94

Page 95
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
38. MALAMA KAUAI (AGRICULTURAL PARK)

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR ESTABLISHMENT OF AN AGRICULTURAL PARK
IN EAST KAUAI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS
A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 350 C c

39. MALAMA NA MAKUA A KEIKI

CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR AND REPLACE
ROOF AND CEILING, RENOVATION OF BATHROOM,
AND OFFICE SPACE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 425 C c

40. MANOA JAPANESE LANGUAGE SCHOOL

CONSTRUCTION FOR BATHROOM RENOVATION.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 130 C c

41. MAUI ADVANCED MANUFACTURING ALLIANCE
CORP.

CONSTRUCTION FOR DEVELOPMENT OF AN
ADVANCED MANUFACTURING CENTER. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 95

Page 96
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
42. NAMAHANA EDUCATION FOUNDATION

CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF
CLASSROOMS AT NAMAHANA SCHOOL. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

43. OLELO COMMUNITY TELEVISION

DESIGN AND EQUIPMENT FOR SERVER
CAPACITY FOR MEDIA CAPTURE, PROCESSING,
AND ADDITIONAL ARCHIVAL SPACE. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

44 . PAPAKOLEA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION

PLANS FOR MASTER PLANNING FOR
EXPANSION OF NATIVE HAWAIIAN EDUCATION
AND CULTURE CENTER IN PUOWAINA. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C C

45. POLYNESIAN VOYAGING SOCIETY

PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RENOVATIONS OF A MARINE EDUCATION AND
TRAINING CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES
AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 175 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 96
■■iiiiin

Page 97 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
46. PUNA COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER
FOUNDATION

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A MEDICAL CAMPUS
IN PUNA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

47. REHABILITATION HOSPITAL OF THE
PACIFIC, THE

EQUIPMENT FOR PURCHASE AND
INSTALLATION OF HOSPITAL BEDS. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 600 C c

48. ST. JAMES EPISCOPAL CHURCH

CONSTRUCTION FOR NEW COMMUNITY CENTER
IN WAIMEA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 200 c c

49. TRUST FOR PUBLIC LAND, THE

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR AALA PARK
IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 475 c c


HB300 CDl FIN
IIIHHHn

Page 98
H.B. NO. S,
h
S.D, 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
50. UNITED STATES VETERANS INITIATIVE

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAINTENANCE AND
IMPROVEMENTS TO EMERGENCY SHELTER IN
WAIANAE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 100 c c

51. WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH,
THE

PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION
OF A PEDIATRIC CLINIC. THIS PROJECT
QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER
42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C c

52. WAIANAE COMMUNITY RE-DEVELOPMENT
CORPORATION

EQUIPMENT FOR FARM EQUIPMENT FOR
PRODUCTION OF ORGANIC PRODUCE. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 100 C c

53. WAIMANALO HEALTH CENTER

CONSTRUCTION FOR ENHANCEMENTS TO A
PATIENT-CENTERED HEALTH CARE HOME. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 350 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 98
iHiiniiiiiiiii

Page 99
H.B. NO. g.i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
54. WAIOHULI HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADERS
ASSOCIATION, INC.

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR COMPUTER CENTER
CONSTRUCTION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A
GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C

55. WEST HAWAII COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER,
INC.

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
CONSTRUCTION OF WORKFORCE HOUSING. THIS
PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 500 C C

56. YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION
OF OAHU (KOKOKAHI)

CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATIONS TO
JULIETTE M. ATHERTON HALL AND KITCHEN.
THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT
PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LBR 400 C C



HB300 GDI FIN 99
inniiiwBiiin

Page 100 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
C. TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES
TRN102 - DANIEL K. INOUYE INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT

1. DANIEL K. INOUYE INTERNATIONAL
AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 17,061E 26, 760 E
TRN 1 N 1 N

TRNlll - HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT

2 . HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 26, 000 E E
TRN 1 N N


HB300 GDI FIN 100

Page 101
H.B. NO. gi
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOP’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN114 - ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE

3. ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL
AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION EOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 137,045E E
TRN 10,000 N N

TRN131 - KAHULUI AIRPORT

4 . KAHULUI AIRPORT, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, MAUI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FIN7VNCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 52,250 E 57,500 E
TRN 5, 000 N N


HB300 CDl FIN 101

Page 102 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN141 - MOLOKAI AIRPORT

5. MOLOKAI AIRPORT, AIRPORT
IMPROVEMENTS, MOLOKAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 6,230 E E
TRN 2, 000 N N

TRN161 - LIHUE AIRPORT

6. LIHUE AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS,
KAUAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND
FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 9,225 E 5,140 E
TRN 1 N 4,600 N

TRN195 - AIRPORTS ADMINISTRATION

7. AIRFIELD IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR AIRFIELD
IMPROVEMENTS AT STATEWIDE AIRPORTS. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 154,877 E 656, 162 E
TRN 1,800 N 60,000 N


HB300 CDl FIN 102
■Miniiin

Page 103
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
8 AIRPORT DEVELOPMENT, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
STATEWIDE IMPROVEMENTS. IMPROVEMENTS
INCLUDE PLANNING STUDIES, SAFETY,
COMPLIANCE, OPERATIONAL EFFICIENCY,
DEVELOPMENT, AND MANAGEMENT SUPPORT
SERVICES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 50, 000 E 39, 000 E
TRN 1 N 1 N

9. AIRPORTS DIVISION CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECT STAFF COSTS,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
COSTS RELATED TO WAGES AND FRINGE
BENEFITS FOR PERMANENT PROJECT FUNDED
STAFF POSITIONS FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION'S
AIRPORTS DIVISION. PROJECT MAY ALSO
INCLUDE FUNDS FOR NON-PERMANENT CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM RELATED POSITIONS
(OTHER FUNDS FROM PASSENGER FACILITY
CHARGES).
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 7,500 B 7,500 B
TRN 200 X 200 X


HB300 CDl FIN 103
■inmiiii

Page 104 300
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
10. FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS OF VARIOUS FACILITIES AND
OTHER RELATED IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 89,500 E 56,500 E
TRN 1 N 1 N

11. LUMP SUM CIP - AIRPORTS PROJECT
ADJUSTMENT FUND, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A
CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT
PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE
APPROPRIATIONS ACT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 E 4 E

12. RENTAL CAR FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE
CONSOLIDATED CAR RENTAL FACILITIES FOR
THE RENTAL CAR AGENCIES AND OTHER RELATED
IMPROVEMENTS (OTHER FUNDS FROM CUSTOMER
FACILITY CHARGES).
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 301,000 X X


HB300 GDI FIN 104
iinniuiHni

Page 105 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
■ S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOP'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN301 - HONOLULU HARBOR

13. HONOLULU HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT HONOLULU HARBOR, OAHU. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 24,992 B 39,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R

TRN303 - KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR

14. KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR,
OAHU. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 34,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R


HB300 CDl FIN 105

Page 106
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN311 - HILO HARBOR

15. HILO HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT HILO HARBOR, HAWAII. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 44,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R

TRN331 - KAHULUI HARBOR

16. KAHULUI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, MAUI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT KAHULUI HARBOR, MAUI. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 9,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R


HB300 GDI FIN 106

Page 107 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN341 - KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR

17. KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS,
MOLOKAI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR, MOLOKAI.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 4 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R

TRN361 - NAWILIWILI HARBOR

18. NAWILIWILI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT NAWILIWILI HARBOR, KAUAI. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 9,992 B 4,992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R


HB300 CDl FIN 107
iiiiiiiiiiinw

Page 108
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN351 - KAUMALAPAU HARBOR

19. KAUMALAPAU HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, LANAI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT
PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR
SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING
AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS
THROUGHOUT KAUMALAPAU HARBOR, LANAI. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4 B 1, 992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R

TRN395 - HARBORS ADMINISTRATION

20. COMMERCIAL HARBORS ADMINISTRATIVE
INITIATIVES, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR COST RELATED TO
STATEWIDE IMPROVEMENTS FOR THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION'S HARBORS DIVISION,
STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 14,992 B 14, 992 B
TRN 4 N 4 N
TRN 4 R 4 R


HB300 CDl FIN 108
iuhmuimiiii

Page 109
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
21. MODERNIZATION PROGRAM - HARBORS
DIVISION CIP PROJECT STAFF COSTS,
STATEWIDE

PLANS FOR COSTS RELATED TO WAGES AND
FRINGE BENEFITS FOR PERMANENT HARBOR
MODERNIZATION PLAN PROJECT FUNDED STAFF
POSITIONS FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
MODERNIZATION PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION'S HARBORS
DIVISION, STATEWIDE. PROJECTS MAY ALSO
INCLUDE FUNDS FOR NON-PERMANENT CAPITAL
IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM RELATED POSITIONS.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2,500 B 2,500 B

TRN501 - OAHU HIGHWAYS

22. ALA WAI CANAL AND WATERWAYS DEBRIS
CLEARING, OAHU

DESIGN AND IMPLEMENT PILOT PROJECT
FOR ALA WAI CANAL AND WATERWAYS TO
PREVENT DEBRIS FROM FLOWING INTO THE ALA
WAI SMALL BOAT HARBOR AND OCEAN.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 750 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 109
■iiiiinni

Page 110
H.B. NO.
g
I I. . 'I
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOP'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
23. INTERSTATE ROUTE H-1 IMPROVEMENTS,
kualakai interchange to WAIAWA
INTERCHANGE, OAHU

DESIGN FOR THE ADDITION OF A TRAVEL
LANE IN EACH DIRECTION OF INTERSTATE
ROUTE H-1, BETWEEN KUALAKAI INTERCHANGE
AND WAIAWA INTERCHANGE. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 400 E 800 E
TRN 1,600 N 3, 200 N

24 . INTERSTATE ROUTE H-1, KUNIA EAST
BOUND ON-RAMP, OAHU

PLANS FOR A KUNIA EAST BOUND ON-RAMP;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,500 E E

25. INTERSTATE ROUTE H-3, FINISH WORK AND
MITIGATION, JUNCTION AT H-1 TO KMCAS,
OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR FINISH WORK RELATED
TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF INTERSTATE ROUTE
H-3. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2, 428 E E
TRN 5, 654 N N


HB300 CDl FIN 110
■iiiniiiiiii

Page 111
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
26. KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A
BARRIER AND SIGNAGE ALONG KAMEHAMEHA
HIGHWAY NEAR THE KIPAPA GULCH BRIDGE TO
ENHANCE PUBLIC SAFETY, PREVENT
UNAUTHORIZED ENCAMPMENTS, AND ENSURE
UNOBSTRUCTED ACCESS TO THE HIGHWAY.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,850 E E

27 . KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY
BETWEEN MILILANI AND PEARL CITY. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT. .
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 3, 720 E E
TRN 14,880 N N

28. LAND ACQUISITION TO SUPPORT THE NORTH
SHORE SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITIES PLAN,
OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, AND DESIGN
FOR ACQUISITION, DUE DILIGENCE, AND EIS
FOR PARCEL LOCATED AT TMK: 6-4-001-015.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4,695 C C

29. PAAKEA ROAD, OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO
PAAKEA ROAD FOR USE AS AN EMERGENCY
PARALLEL ROUTE ON THE WEST COAST OF OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 5, 000 E E


HB300 CDl FIN

Page 112
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN511 - HAWAII HIGHWAYS

30. ALTERNATE ROUTE SELECTION STUDY FOR
PUNA MAKAI ALTERNATE ROUTE, HAWAII

PLANS FOR ALTERNATIVE ROUTE FOR PUNA
MAKAI.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,500 E E

31 . ALTERNATE ROUTE SELECTION STUDY FOR
PUNA MAUKA, HAWAII

PLANS FOR ALTERNATIVE ROUTE FOR PUNA
MAUKA; PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL
BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF HAWAII
CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR
STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,000 E E
TRN 1,000 S S

32. PUAINAKO STREET IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CORRIDOR
IMPROVEMENTS ALONG PUAINAKO STREET. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2,000 E 4,800 E
TRN N 19, 200 N


HB300 CDl FIN 112

Page 113
H.B. NO. ^.1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN531 - MAUI HIGHWAYS

33. HANA HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS, HUELO TO
HANA, MAUI

CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVING, UPGRADING
AND/OR REPAIRING ROADWAYS, BRIDGES,
WALLS, DRAINAGE STRUCTURES, GUARDRAILS,
AND OTHER FACILITIES ON ROUTE 360 HANA
HIGHWAY. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY
TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING
AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,000B B
TRN 4,000 N N

34. PIILANI HIGHWAY WIDENING, KILOHANA
DRIVE TO WAILEA IKE DRIVE, MAUI

LAND ACQUISITION FOR SAFETY,
OPERATIONAL, AND CAPACITY IMPROVEMENTS
FOR VEHICLES AND MULTIMODAL USERS ALONG
PIILANI HIGHWAY FROM KILOHANA DRIVE TO
WAILEA IKE DRIVE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN E 100E
TRN N 400 N


HB300 CDl FIN 113

Page 114
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
35. WAIALE ROAD EXTENSION, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A
WAIALE ROAD EXTENSION TO THE WAIKAPU
COUNTRY TOWN PROJECT. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 5,000E E
TRN IN N

TRN561 - KAUAI HIGHWAYS

36. KAUMUALII HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS, LIHUE
TO WEST OF MALUHIA ROAD, KAUAI

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR WIDENING OF KAUMUALII
HIGHWAY, LIHUE TO WEST OF MALUHIA ROAD,
FROM TWO TO FOUR LANES. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN l, 000 E 5, 200 E
TRN 4,000 N 20,SOON


HB300 CDl FIN 114

Page 115
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
TRN595 - HIGHWAYS ADMINISTRATION

37. HIGHWAY DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENTS,
STATEWIDE

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENTS TO
HIGHWAY FACILITIES INCLUDING INSTALLATION
OF DRAINAGE FACILITIES, CATCH BASINS,
GRATED DROP INLETS, LINED SWALES,
HEADWALLS, AND CULVERTS, DRYWELLS,
DITCHES, AND BASINS AT VARIOUS LOCATIONS,
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,348 B B
TRN 3, 090 E 1,600 E
TRN 4, 360 N 4,000 N

38. HIGHWAY ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION AND
REMEDIATION, STATEWIDE

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION
AND REMEDIATION MEASURES, INCLUDING
EROSION CONTROL INSTALLATIONS AND BEST
MANAGEMENT PRACTICES AT VARIOUS
LOCATIONS, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 4,250 E 4,000 E


HB300 CDl FIN 115
■iiinHii

Page 116
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
39. HIGHWAY PLANNING, STATEWIDE

PLANS FOR FEDERAL AID AND NON-FEDERAL
AID PROGRAMS AND PROJECTS THAT INCLUDE
ROADWAY CLASSIFICATION, DATA COLLECTION,
LONG- AND MID-RANGE PLANNING,
TRANSPORTATION NEEDS STUDIES, HRS
343/NEPA STUDIES, CORRIDOR STUDIES,
SCOPING, AND BRIDGE EVALUATIONS. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.-
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 962 E E
TRN 3, 848 N N

40. HIGHWAY PROJECT CLOSEOUT, STATEWIDE

LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR COMPLETION AND CLOSEOUT
OF PROJECTS IN CLOSING STAGES AND/OR FOR
PROJECTS REQUIRING FUNDS FOR FINAL
SETTLEMENT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 800 E 900 E
TRN 2 N 3 N


HB300 CDl FIN 116

Page 117 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
41. HIGHWAY RESEARCH, STATEWIDE

PLANS FOR FEDERAL AID AND NON-FEDERAL
AID RESEARCH AND PROJECTS, INCLUDING
TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER AND WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 600 B B
TRN 4,425 E 4,300 E
TRN 20,101N 17,200 N

42. HIGHWAY SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO HIGHWAY
FACILITIES NECESSARY FOR HIGHWAY SYSTEM
SAFETY. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY
TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING
AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,405 B 300 B
TRN 11,308 E 12,190 E
TRN 24,994 N 9, 560 N


HB300 CDl FIN 117

Page 118 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
43. HIGHWAY STRUCTURAL FACILITIES
PROGRAM, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR THE REPLACEMENT,
UPGRADE, REHABILITATION, AND/OR MAJOR
REPAIR OF HIGHWAY STRUCTURES, INCLUDING
BRIDGES, TUNNELS, METAL CULVERTS, AND
DESTINATION SIGN STRUCTURES. THIS PROJECT
IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR
FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 14,063 B 11,920 B
TRN 66, 686 E 72,603 E
TRN 396, 400 N 338, 094 N

44. HIGHWAY SYSTEM ENHANCEMENT, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE FOR AND IMPROVE
HIGHWAY SYSTEM ENHANCEMENTS, INCLUDING
PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE FACILITIES. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 990B 610B
TRN 15, 738 E 5,631E
TRN 26, 502 N 17,717N


HB300 CDl FIN 118

Page 119 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
*->Jbi»tx4mso^'ooo\o*HJbWki4m\oMooo'o-H»stwUi»u\o^-eoosO‘-ij<kw^m 45. HIGHWAY SYSTEM PRESERVATION
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE
CONSTRUCTION FOR THE PRESERVATION OF
THE STATE HIGHWAY SYSTEM AND ITS
FACILITIES, INCLUDING PAVEMENT, AND
SIGNAGE, AND THE ADDRESS OF SHORELINE AND
BRIDGE SCOUR ISSUES. THIS PROJECT IS
DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL
AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 2, 540 B 4,513 B
TRN 23,361 E E
TRN 106, 104 N IN
46. HIGHWAY TRAFFIC OPERATIONAL
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE
LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO EXISTING
HIGHWAY FACILITIES FOR MORE EFFICIENT
TRAFFIC FLOW. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,775 B B
TRN 26, 064 E 10,100 E
TRN 32,394 N 40, 400 N
TRN 700 S S
47. PACIFIC PALISADES, OAHU
PLANS FOR AN EMERGENCY EGRESS/INGRESS
ROUTE FOR PACIFIC PALISADES.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN 1,000C C
HB300 CDl FIN 119

Page 120 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
D. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
HTH840 - ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT

1. SAFE DRINKING WATER REVOLVING FUND,
STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE STATE MATCH
FUNDS FOR FEDERAL CAPITALIZATION GRANTS
FOR DRINKING WATER TREATMENT REVOLVING
LOAN FUND, PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 340E, HRS.
THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5,913C 5,913C
HTH 29, 558 N 29, 558 N

2. WASTEWATER TREATMENT REVOLVING FUND
FOR POLLUTION CONTROL, STATEWIDE

CONSTRUCTION FUNDS TO PROVIDE STATE
MATCH FOR FEDERAL CAPITALIZATION GRANTS
FOR WASTEWATER PROJECTS. FUNDS TO BE
TRANSFERRED TO THE WATER POLLUTION
CONTROL REVOLVING FUND PURSUANT TO
CHAPTER 342D, HRS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5, 082 C 5, 082 C
HTH 25,406 N 25, 406 N


HB300 GDI FIN 120
iiiiiiiiihuhi

Page 121
H.B. NO. S
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNR401 - ECOSYSTEM PROTECTION AND RESTORATION

3. ANUENUE FISHERIES RESEARCH CENTER
ANNEX, ROOF REPAIR/PHOTOVOLTAIC
SYSTEM INSTALLATION, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
ROOF REPAIR AND INSTALLATION OF A
PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM AT THE ANUENUE
FISHERIES RESEARCH CENTER ANNEX (AFRC
ANNEX).
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 750 C c

4 . FISHING ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, AND RELATED WORK FOR
IMPROVEMENTS ACROSS FISHING AREAS ON
OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 400 C c

LNR402 - NATIVE RESOURCES AND FIRE PROTECTION PROGRAM

5. KAWAINUI MARSH PROTECTION AND
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU •

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
PREDATOR FENCING, BUFFERS, AND ACCESS
IMPROVEMENTS, VICINITY OF KAWAINUI LEVEE
TO KAWAINUI MODEL AIRPLANE FIELD.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 8, 750 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 121
iiiiiiiiwiin

Page 122
H.B. NO. S,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
6. POHAKEA FIRE PREVENTION AND
SUPPRESSION INFRASTRUCTURE, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR A SECTION OF DLNR LANDS IN
WEST MAUI HIGHLY PRONE TO WILDFIRE DUE TO
INVASIVE GRASSES. THE RECENT ACQUISITION
OF THREE WELLS AND A 750,OOO-GALLON WATER
TANK WILL ENABLE THE BRANCH TO REPLACE
HAZARDOUS FUEL LOADS WITH GREEN BREAKS,
RIPARIAN CORRIDORS, AND GRAZING BREAKS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1,750 C c

LNR404 - WATER RESOURCES

7 . DEEP MONITOR WELLS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION TO CONSTRUCT AND/OR REPAIR
DEEP MONITOR WELLS STATEWIDE TO MONITOR
THE HEALTH OF DRINKING WATER AQUIFERS;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, AND OTHER
RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,000 C c

8 . KEAUHOU AQUIFER SYSTEM, HAWAII

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR TWO DEEP MONITOR WELLS
FOR THE KEAUHOU AQUIFER SYSTEM TO MONITOR
THE HEALTH OF THE DRINKING WATER AQUIFER;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, AND OTHER
RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 4,000 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 122
iinniiinin

Page 123
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
LNR405 - CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT
9. DOCARE HAWAII BRANCH OFFICE BUILDING
RENOVATION, HAWAII
DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE
RENOVATION OF THE DOCARE HAWAII BRANCH
OFFICE DUE TO SEVERE TERMITE INFESTATION
RESULTING IN MAJOR DAMAGE TO THE
STRUCTURE, INCLUDING INTERIOR WALLS,
SUPPORT BEAMS, DOORS, AND RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,000C C
10. LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, AND DESIGN
FOR DIVISION OF CONSERVATION AND
RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT FACILITY, OAHU.
LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, AND DESIGN
FOR DIVISION OF CONSERVATION AND
RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT FACILITY, OAHU, TMK
7-4-001-025.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2, 4 50 C C
LNR407 - NATURAL AREA RESERVES AND WATERSHED MANAGEMENT
11. KAWAINUI MARSH, OAHU
PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF
WATER TRANSFER SYSTEM FROM KAWAINUI MARSH
ACROSS THE KAWAINUI FLOOD CONTROL LEVEE
TO HAMAKUA MARSH AND IMPROVEMENTS TO ROAD
AND ACCESS TO KAWAINUI FLOOD CONTROL
LEVEE FOR MAINTENANCE TO USAGE STANDARDS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,200C C
J^JJC^i4^a^0^000\Ol-l^>^^(.i4^a^0^000\O‘-lJ^i>t^4^7(\0^0Q0VO-HJbi*^.>*^a^0
HB300 CDl FIN 123
■Hiiiiin

Page 124
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
12. WATERSHED PROTECTION AND INITIATIVES,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO PROTECT
AND RESTORE FORESTED WATERSHEDS AND OTHER
WATER SUPPLIES, STATEWIDE; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES, AND ALL PROJECT RELATED
COSTS. THE LEGISLATURE FINDS AND DECLARES
THAT THE APPROPRIATION IS IN THE PUBLIC
INTEREST AND FOR THE PUBLIC'S HEALTH,
SAFETY, AND GENERAL WELFARE OF THE STATE.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 5, 000 C


HB300 CDl FIN 124
niiiiiiMiii

Page 125
H.B. NO. J
h j
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
E. HEALTH
HTI1100 - COMMUNICABLE DISEASE AND PUBLIC HEALTH NURSING

1 . KALAUPAPA SETTLEMENT, CARE HOME
IMPROVEMENTS, MOLOKAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR NECESSARY
IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR HEALTH AND
SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE
REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 2, 500 C C

2 . KALAUPAPA SETTLEMENT, CLOSE C&D
LANDFILL, AND INSTALL SYNTHETIC COVER
LAYER AT MSW LANDFILL, MOLOKAI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO CLOSE
LANDFILLS AND INSTALL SYNTHETIC COVER.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 5, 500 C C

HTH211 - KAHUKU HOSPITAL

3. KAHUKU MEDICAL CENTER, LUMP SUM
PROJECTS, OAHU

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR RENOVATION AND IMPROVEMENTS OF KAHUKU
MEDICAL CENTER BUILDING AND CAMPUS;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5, 800 C 5,000 C


HB300 GDI FIN 125

II |^ * । —
Page 126 300
H.B. NO.
HD1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HTH212 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION - REGIONS

4 . HOOLA LAHUI HAWAII, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A MEDICAL AND
DENTAL OUTPATIENT CLINIC FOR A FEDERALLY
QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER AND NATIVE
HAWAIIAN HEALTH CARE SYSTEM SITE.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 1,500C C

5 . KAU HOSPITAL, KEAAU OUTPATIENT
CENTER, HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR SITE WORK FOR A NEW AMBULATORY CARE
CENTER IN KEAAU, PROVIDED THAT NO FUNDS
SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE UNLESS MATCHED
DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR IN CASH OR BY IN-KIND
DONATIONS BY THE PRIVATE SECTOR.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH C 25,000C
HTH R 25,000R

6. LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS
CORPORATION - HAWAII REGION, HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR THE HAWAII REGIONS OF THE HAWAII
HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS AND RENOVATIONS INCLUDING
RENOVATIONS AND/OR EXPANSION OF
FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5,500C 4,300C


HB300 CDl FIN 126

Page 127
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7 LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS
CORPORATION - KAUAI REGION, KAUAI

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR THE KAUAI REGION OF THE HAWAII HEALTH
SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR IMPROVEMENTS AND
RENOVATIONS INCLUDING NEW FACILITIES,
RENOVATION, EXPANSION, AND/OR REPLACEMENT
OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 20,000 C 12,500 C

8. SAMUEL MAHELONA MEMORIAL HOSPITAL
MASTER PLAN, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR DEVELOPMENT OF A
MASTER PLAN FOR SAMUEL MAHELONA MEMORIAL
HOSPITAL, INCLUDING CONNECTOR ROAD
PLANNING.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 500 C C

9. WHR KONA COMMUNITY HOSPITAL -
EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE RECONFIGURATION AND
RENOVATION OF THE EMERGENCY ROOM AND
ADJACENT CRITICAL CARE FACILITIES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 1,339 C 11,909 C


HB300 CDl FIN 127
iBIKIIHUIIIil

Page 128 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
HTH214 - MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM, A KFH LLC

10. LUMP SUM MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM,
FACILITIES REPAIR, RENOVATIONS AND
UPGRADES, MAUI AND LANAI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS, REPAIRS,
RENOVATIONS, EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION AND
UPGRADES TO MAUI MEMORIAL MEDICAL CENTER
(MMMC), KULA HOSPITAL (KH) , AND LANAI
COMMUNITY HOSPITAL (LCH).
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 6,000 C 6, 000 C

HTH215 - HHSC - OAHU REGION

11. LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS
CORPORATION, OAHU REGION, OAHU

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR THE OAHU REGION OF THE HAWAII HEALTH
SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR IMPROVEMENTS AND
RENOVATIONS INCLUDING RENOVATIONS AND/OR
EXPANSION OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HTH 5, 600 C 5, HOC

HTH430 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - INPATIENT

12. HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, HALE HOOLA
BUILDING, RENOVATIONS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR RENOVATIONS TO THE HAWAII
STATE HOSPITAL.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 16,000C 11,000C


HB300 CDl FIN 128

Page 129 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
13. HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, HEALTH AND
SAFETY, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR NECESSARY
5z IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR HEALTH AND
SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE
REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 3,150 C 5,750 C

14 . HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, REPAIR CHILLED
WATER LINE AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS,
OAHU

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
TO REPAIR UNDERGROUND CHILLED WATER LINE
AND OTHER RELATED IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 1,000 C c

15. HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, WATER SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER WORK, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR WATER
SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 3,500 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 129
niraiHiM

Page 130
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
F. SOCIAL SERVICES
HES503 - HAWAII YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY (HYCF)

1. KYFWC SECURED CUSTODY FACILITY
REROOF, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO REPAIR AND
RENOVATE THE SECURED CUSTODY FACILITY'S
ROOF AT THE KAWAILOA YOUTH AND FAMILY
WELLNESS CENTER CAMPUS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 3, 720 C c

DEF112 - SERVICES TO VETERANS

2. 3RD HAWAII STATE VETERAN'S HOME, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGNS, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT COSTS FOR A NEW LONG-TERM CARE
STATE VETERANS HOME ON THE ISLAND OF
MAUI. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO
QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF 35,000 C c
DEF 58, 000 P p

HMS220 - RENTAL HOUSING SERVICES

3. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
DEVELOPMENT, MAYOR WRIGHT HOMES, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE
HPHA KA LEI MOMI DEVELOPMENT, MAYOR
WRIGHT HOMES.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 56,000 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 130
■iiiDiiniiii

Page 131 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN 000’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4 . CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMiaNU HOMES I,
OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES I,
WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES,
PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND
OTHER RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2,350 C C

5. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES,
MULTI-PHASE, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KTkAHUMANU HOMES,
MULTI-PHASE, WHICH MAY INCLUDE
ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING,
ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED
WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 700 C C

6. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, KAPAA HOMES, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAPAA HOMES, WHICH
MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES,
PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND
OTHER RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 4,000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 131
■iMwian

Page 132 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7 . CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES I,
HAWAII

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES I,
WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES,
PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND
OTHER RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 3,500 C C

8. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES,
MULTI-PHASE, HAWAII

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES,
MULTI-PHASE, WHICH MAY INCLUDE
ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING,
ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED
WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 700 C C

9. CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING
REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI
PREDEVELOPMENT, NANAKULI HOMES, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN
INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI
MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, NANAKULI HOMES,
WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES,
PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND
OTHER RELATED WORK.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 750 C C


HB300 GDI FIN 132
niiiHiiiiiii

Page 133 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOP'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
-lJ^J»C.i4^7(^0J'00O'O‘->Jb>>(.»^la^0J'000\O^J^W,i4^/^^0^eQ0^O‘-tJVW^4^7^ ‘ HHL602 - PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT FOR HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADS
10. LUMP SUM REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE -
HAWAIIAN HOME LANDS EXISTING
INFRASTRUCTURE, STATEWIDE
PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE OF EXISTING
INFRASTRUCTURE ON VARIOUS HAWAIIAN HOME
LANDS, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING HHL 20,000C C
HMS904 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS
11. IT MODERNIZATION FOR THE BES SYSTEM,
STATEWIDE
CONSTRUCTION TO COMPLETE THE BENEFITS
ELIGIBILITY SOLUTION (BES) IT SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING HMS 10,000C C
HMS777 - OFFICE ON HOMELESSNESS AND HOUSING SOLUTIONS
12. KAUHALE DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS LUMP
SUM, STATEWIDE
PLANS, DESIGN, LAND ACQUISITION,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR KAUHALE
DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS, STATEWIDE, GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENT; ACCESS, SERVICES,
AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING HMS 24,400C 13,000C
HB300 CDl FIN 133
iiiiiiiniiiiHi

Page 134
H.B. NO. S
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
G. FORMAL EDUCATION
EDNIOO - SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING

1. JAMES CAMPBELL HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU

CONTINUATION OF PHASED FUNDING FOR
TITLE IX PROJECT FOR DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION OF ATHLETIC STADIUM AND
SUPPORT FACILITIES, INCLUDING LOCKER
ROOMS UNDER BLEACHERS, FITNESS AND WEIGHT
ROOM, RENOVATION OF PLAY COURTS; AND
ALTERNATIVES, INCLUDING CONCESSION STAND,
RESTROOM, AND VISITOR BLEACHERS; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 9, 000 C C

2. KAILUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
THE ATHLETIC COMPLEX GIRLS LOCKER ROOM;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 9, 500 C C

3. LUMP SUM CIP - CAPACITY, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR CAPACITY;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.'
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 3,000 C c


HB300 GDI FIN 134

Page 135 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4 . LUMP SUM CIP - COMPLIANCE, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS TO
BRING THE DOE IN COMPLIANCE WITH ADA,
ABR, AND GENDER EQUITY REQUIREMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 16, 000 C c

5 . LUMP SUM CIP - DEFERRED MAINTENANCE
PROJECTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
MAINTAIN AND IMPROVE FACILITIES AND
INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING HAZARDOUS
MATERIALS REMEDIATION; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 71,000 C c

6. LUMP SUM CIP - FEDERAL GRANTS,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
REPLACEMENT OR RENOVATED BUILDINGS OR
REPLACEMENT SCHOOLS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN c 30,000 C
p 120,000 P


HB300 CDl FIN 135
■iiiiiiiiin

Page 136
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOP’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7 . LUMP SUM CIP - HEALTH AND SAFETY,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO SCHOOL FACILITIES AND
GROUNDS TO MEET HEALTH AND SAFETY
REQUIREMENTS/LAWS, AND ORDINANCES AND/OR
COUNTY REQUIREMENTS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 40,000C C

8 . LUMP SUM CIP - INSTRUCTIONAL,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR EQUITY,
INCLUDING RENOVATION, EXPANSION AND/OR
REPLACEMENT OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 2, 000 C C

9. LUMP SUM CIP - PROJECT COMPLETION,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR PROJECT COMPLETION INCLUDING
CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT COSTS, PURCHASE
ORDERS, UTILITIES CHARGES, CHANGE ORDERS,
AND ALL OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
COMPLETION OF A PROJECT.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 50,000C C


HB300 CDl FIN 136
iiHiiiHiiiiini

Page 137 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR O YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
10. LUMP SUM CIP - SUPPORT FACILITIES,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE
IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING OR NEW SCHOOL
FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 18,000 C c

11. LUMP SUM CIP - TELECOMMUNICATIONS,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
TO MAINTAIN AND IMPROVE DOE'S CONVERGED
INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDING BELLS AND PAGING
FOR SCHOOL SAFETY; CONVERGED
INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDING SCHOOLS' ACCESS
TO ONLINE LEARNING AND INTERNET
RESOURCES; TELECOMMUNICATIONS, AND
ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 3, 000 C c

12. MCKINLEY HS ATHLETIC COMPLEX
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
VARIOUS ATHLETIC COMPLEX IMPROVEMENTS,
INCLUDING BLEACHERS AND LIGHTS; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 7,000 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 137

H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
13. PAIA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL NEW CLASSROOM,
MAUI

CONSTRUCTION FOR A NEW CLASSROOM
BUILDING AT PAIA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 35, 000 C c

14 . PUU KUKUI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
TWO PORTABLE CLASSROOMS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 3,200 C c

15 . REGIONAL KITCHENS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, EQUIPMENT,
FURNISHING, AND APPURTENANCES FOR THE
EXPANSION OF REGIONAL KITCHENS,
STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 55, 650 C 16, 500 C

16. WILCOX ELEMENTARY SCHOOL TENNIS
COURTS, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RECONSTRUCTION AND IMPROVEMENTS OF TENNIS
COURTS INCLUDING FENCING, TENNIS NETS,
RESURFACING, AND STRIPING; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 950 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 138
■■■iiini

Page 139
H.B. NO. J
h j
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
EDN450 - SCHOOL FACILITIES AUTHORITY

17. LUMP SUM CIP - PRE-KINDERGARTEN
CAPACITY

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES FOR NEW
FACILITIES AND/OR RENOVATION,
IMPROVEMENT, AND EXPANSION OF EXISTING
SCHOOL FACILITIES; GROUND & SITE
IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 20,000C C

18. NEW CENTRAL MAUI ELEMENTARY AND
MIDDLE SCHOOL, MAUI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES
FOR NEW K-8 SCHOOL USING STANDARDS BASED
DESIGNS, MODERN EDUCATIONAL
SPECIFICATIONS, DESIGN GUIDES,
CONSTRUCTION SPECIFICATIONS, STANDARD
TECHNICAL DRAWINGS, 7VND COMMISSIONING
PLANS, FOR ACCELERATED CONSTRUCTION
SCHEDULES AND BUILDING MAINTAINABILITY.
TOTAL FUNDING EDN 35,000C C


HB300 CDl FIN 139
HWHIIHM

Page 140 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
EDN407 - PUBLIC LIBRARIES
19. HAWAII STATE PUBLIC LIBRARY SYSTEM,
HEALTH AND SAFETY, STATEWIDE
PLANS, DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
HEALTH, SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER
CODE REQUIREMENTS. PROJECTS MAY INCLUDE,
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE REMOVAL OF
HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATIONS FOR
LIBRARY PATRONS AND EMPLOYEES,
ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROLS, FIRE PROTECTION,
IMPROVEMENTS TO BUILDINGS GROUNDS, AND
NEW CONSTRUCTION; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 25,000C 25,000C
20. KAPAA LIBRARY, KAUAI
PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A NEW KAPTIA
LIBRARY.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 2,000 C C
DEF114 - HAWAII NATIONAL GUARD YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY
21. YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY 61786 AND
B1787 UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU
DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR UPGRADES
AND IMPROVEMENTS TO BUILDINGS 1786 AND
1787, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WINDOW
SYSTEM, PLUMBING, AIR CONDITIONING,
EMERGENCY GENERATOR SYSTEM, UTILITY
SYSTEM, FIRE ALARMS, AND OTHER SYSTEMS AT
THE YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY IN KALAELOA,
OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF 8,000 C C
J^W^m\04'000\O^^^>^W^tfL^0^x'000\O^*>IW^4m^04'e00\O^►^^W^I/^^04'000S®
HB300 CDl FIN 140
llilllllllllli

Page 141 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
UOHIOO - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA

22. UHM, HOLMES HALL, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO RENOVATE
AND MODERNIZE HOLMES HALL STUDENT LABS
THAT SUPPORT CIVIL, MECHANICAL, AND
ELECTRICAL ENGINEERING PROGRAMS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 9, 000 C c

23. UHM, STUDENT HOUSING SERVICES (SHS)
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UH MANOA STUDENT
HOUSING SERVICES FACILITIES. PROJECTS TO
INCLUDE RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS, AND
MODERNIZATION TO THE INTERIOR AND
EXTERIOR OF THE FACILITIES. IMPROVEMENTS
INCLUDE BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO ROOFS,
BUILDING ENVELOPE, MECHANICAL,
ELECTRICAL, PLUMBING, FIRE PROTECTION
SYSTEMS, ELEVATORS, STRUCTURAL, AND
PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 30,750 C 28,500 C
UOH 30,750 E 28,500 E

24 . UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT MANOA COLLEGE
OF TROPICAL AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN
RESILIENCE, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, TiND CONSTRUCTION FOR
THE WAIMANALO CTAHR AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH
AND EXTENSION STATION (CARES) CENTER,
INCLUDING REPAIRS, MAINTENANCE, AND
DEMOLITION OF BUILDINGS, AND PHASE I
REDESIGN.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 4,000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN
■iiiiiniii

Page 142 H.B. NO. “ 1
h
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOP'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
25. UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT MANOA COLLEGE
OF TROPICAL AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN
RESILIENCE, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR DEVELOPMENT OF THE
CONTROLLED ENVIRONMENTAL AGRICULTURE
INNOVATION FARM LOCATED AT THE MAGOON
RESEARCH STATION IN MANOA.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 6, 000 C C

26. UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA CAMPUS,
ATHLETIC FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
VARIOUS REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS TO
ATHLETIC FACILITIES AND FIELD
IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 10,000 C C

UOH210 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, HILO

27. HILO, RENEW, IMPROVE, AND MODERNIZE,
HAWAII

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UNIVERSITY OF
HAWAII, HILO. PROJECTS TO INCLUDE
RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS, AND MODERNIZATION
OF INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR STRUCTURES,
ROOFS, MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS,
PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS, ROADWAYS, GROUNDS,
AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE
EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW FACILITIES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 15,000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 142
iiniHiniiiiiMii

II |—^ » •
Page 143 300
H.B. NO.
HD,’
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
UOH700 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, WEST OAHU

28. UHWO, RENEW, IMPROVE, AND MODERNIZE,
OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO UNIVERSITY
OF HAWAII AT WEST OAHU FACILITIES.
PROJECTS TO INCLUDE RENEWAL,
IMPROVEMENTS, AND MODERNIZATION OF
INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR STRUCTURES, ROOFS,
MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS,
PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS, ROADWAYS, GROUNDS,
AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE
EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW FACILITIES;
PLANNING PROJECTS AND STUDIES; AND ALL
PROJECT RELATED COSTS.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 6,500C C

UOH800 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, COMMUNITY COLLEGES

29. CCS, CAPITAL RENEWAL AND DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE, AND MINOR CIP STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO UH COMMUNITY COLLEGES
SYSTEM FACILITIES. PROJECTS TO INCLUDE
CAPITAL RENEWAL, REDUCTION OF MAINTENANCE
BACKLOG, MAJOR AND MINOR RENOVATIONS,
MODERNIZATION OF FACILITIES, RE-ROOFING,
MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS,
RESURFACING, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEMOLITION
OF EXISTING FACILITIES, AND OTHER REPAIRS
AND PROJECT COSTS FOR UPGRADES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 20,000C C


HB300 CDl FIN 143
MlillllHIII

Page 144
H.B. NO. S,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
30. CCS, MINOR CIP FOR THE COMMUNITY
COLLEGES, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR MINOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS
PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR CAMPUS FACILITIES
WITHIN THE UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII COMMUNITY
COLLEGES SYSTEM. PROJECT MAY INCLUDE
RENOVATIONS FOR THE MODERNIZATION OF
FACILITIES, ADDITIONS, DEMOLITION OF
EXISTING FACILITIES, AND OTHER
IMPROVEMENTS AND PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE
AND IMPROVE FACILITIES OF THE COMMUNITY
COLLEGES SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 20,000 C c

31. KAUAI CC, STUDENT, FACULTY/STAFF, AND
WORKFORCE HOUSING, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
STUDENT, FACULTY/STAFF, AND WORKFORCE
HOUSING; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 5, 000 C 10, 000 c

UOH900 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, SYSTEMWIDE SUPPORT

32. HAWAII UNDERSEA RESEARCH LABORATORY
AND MAKAI PIER, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT RELATED TO THE DEMOLITION OF
THE HAWAII UNDERSEA RESEARCH LABORATORY
BUILDING AND APPURTENANT REPAIRS TO MAKAI
PIER.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 500 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 144
■IIIIIIIIIIIH

Page 145
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
33. SYSTEM, RENEW, IMPROVE, AND
MODERNIZE, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE
UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII SYSTEM FACILITIES.
PROJECT TO INCLUDE RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS,
AND MODERNIZATION OF INTERIOR AND
EXTERIOR STRUCTURES, STUDENT HOUSING
FACILITIES, ROOFS, MECHANICAL AND
ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS, PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS,
ROADWAYS, GROUNDS AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS
TO UPGRADE EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW
FACILITIES.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 50, 000 C c

34. SYSTEM, UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII PROJECT
ADJUSTMENT FUND, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A
CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT
PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE
APPROPRIATIONS ACT.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 4 C 4 C


HB300 CDl FIN 145
iHniiiiniii

k i
Page 146 H■ ■ .B. N O. 300 .1
hd
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO’S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
H. CULTURE AND RECREATION
UOH881 - AQUARIA

1. WAIKIKI AQUARIUM IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REPLACEMENT OF THE CEILING
IN EXHIBIT GALLERIES, RESURFACING OF THE
GALLERY FLOORING, AND UPGRADING OF THE
ELECTRICAL SYSTEM IN AQUARIUM.
TOTAL FUNDING UOH 1,702 C C

AGS881 - STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS

2. PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, OAHU

LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR A
PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, OAHU,
TMK 7-4-007-002.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 8,500C C

LNR806 - PARKS ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION

3. STATE PARKS INFRASTRUCTURE AND PARK
IMPROVEMENTS, LUMP SUM, STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF
IMPROVEMENTS TO STATE PARKS (WAILUA RIVER
SP, PUA'A KA‘A SW, WAILOA RIVER SRA,
KEOLONAHIHI SHP, KEAIWA HEIAU SRA),
STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
REIMBURSEMENT AND/OR FINANCING.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 2,650C C
LNR 500 N N


HB300 CDl FIN 146

Page 147 ■ ■ 300
H.B. NO.
hki
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
4. WAHIAWA FRESHWATER STATE RECREATION
AREA PARK IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHINGS FOR PARK
IMPROVEMENTS, EXPANSION, AND THE
DEVELOPMENT OF FACILITIES AT WAHIAWA
FRESHWATER STATE RECREATION AREA. THIS
PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY
FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR
REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 5,750C 2,150C
LNR 250N 250N

LNR801 - OCEAN-BASED RECREATION

5. ALA WAI CANAL WALL REPAIR, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
ALA WAI SBH CANAL WALL REPAIR AND HAUL-
OUT REMOVAL; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 5, 000 C C

6. KAWAIHAE NORTH SMALL BOAT HARBOR,
HAWAII

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO HARBOR DOCK, BREAK WALL,
AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 9,450C C

7. LAHAINA SMALL BOAT HARBOR MAINTENANCE
DREDGING, MAUI

CONSTRUCTION FOR MAINTENANCE DREDGING
OF HARBOR BASIN AND ENTRANCE CHANNEL.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 5,000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 147
iiiiiwiinw

Page 148
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
8 . LAHAINA SMALL BOAT HARBOR
RECONSTRUCTION OF OUTER MARGINAL
WHARF, MAUI

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF HARBOR
OUTER MARGINAL WHARF DESTROYED BY AUGUST
2023 WILDFIRES.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 8,000 C C

9. POHOIKI SAFE SWIM AREA, HAWAII

PLANS AND DESIGN INCLUDING
FEASIBILITY STUDY AND SITE SELECTION FOR
THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SAFE SWIM AREA
LOCATED IN POHOIKI.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 200 C C

10. REPLACEMENT OF FISH HOIST AND
CONCRETE LANDING STRUCTURES, MILOLII
LANDING, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REPLACEMENT OF FISH HOIST
WITH NEW FISH HOIST ASSEMBLY AND CONCRETE
FOOTING; REMOVAL OF EXISTING
DAMAGED/DETERIORATING CONCRETE LANDING
STRUCTURES, AND CONSTRUCTION OF NEW
CONCRETE LANDING STRUCTURES INCLUDING NEW
CLEATS AND BULL RAILS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1, 000 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 148
IHlBiHI

Page 149
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
I . PUBLIC SAFETY
LAW900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

1 . PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT AND FURNISHING FOR
DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT
FACILITY, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT AND FURNISHING FOR A DEPARTMENT
OF LAW ENFORCEMENT FACILITY. GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES, TMKs 7-1-002:004 (por.)
009 (por.); 023(por.).
TOTAL FUNDING LAW 3, 000 C C

PSD900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

2 . DCR 10-YR DEPTkRTMENT MASTER PLAN, NEW
FACILITIES, AND SUSTAINABLE MASTER
PLANS, AND OTHER PLANNING
ASSESSMENTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS TO UPDATE THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION'S 10-YEAR
MASTER PLAN, NEW FACILITY, AND
SUSTAINABILITY MASTER PLANS AND OTHER
PLANNING ASSESSMENTS, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 250 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 149
HIIIHIIIIIIfl

II K 1
Page
H.B. NO.
HD i
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR O
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
3. DCR FAC-WIDE REPAIRS, DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE, RELATED SUPPORT AND
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
AND RELATED SERVICES IN SUPPORT OF AND TO
ADDRESS IMMEDIATE REPAIRS, DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE, AND IMPROVEMENTS AFFECTING
FACILITY AND BUILDING INFRASTRUCTURE,
SECURITY, AND OPERATIONS OR SIMILAR,
WHILE ALSO ADDRESSING CODE VIOLATIONS
AND/OR CITATIONS AFFECTING PSD
FACILITIES, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING PSD 5, 000 C C

4 . DCR FAC-WIDE SECURITY PERIMETER
FENCING REPAIRS, UPGRADES, AND
RELATED IMPROVEMENTS, LUMP SUM CIP,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO REPAIR, UPGRADE, AND CONDUCT
NECESSARY GROUND IMPROVEMENTS TO DCR'S
FACILITIES STATEWIDE, PERIMETER SECURITY
FENCE SYSTEM REPAIRS, RETAINING WALLS,
AND REPAIRS TO IMPACTED AREAS, WHILE ALSO
PROVIDING THE NECESSARY SECURITY
PERIMETER MONITORING SYSTEMS, LIGHTING,
AND SECURITY CAMERA SYSTEM WHERE NEEDED.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 10, 000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 150
iiiiniiHiw

Page 151 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
5 . DCR, DOJ ARCHITECTURAL BARRIER
REMOVAL, ADA AND OTHER RELATED
IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO CORRECT AND ADDRESS CURRENT
ADA VIOLATIONS CITED BY THE U.S. DEPT OF
JUSTICE (DOJ) UNDER A SETTLEMENT
AGREEMENT WITH THE STATE OF HAWAII, AND
TO ADDRESS ASSOCIATED ADA NON-DOJ CODE
VIOLATIONS AT DCR FACILITIES, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 7,000 C c

6. HALAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY,
CONSOLIDATED HEALTH CARE UNIT, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO CONSTRUCT A NEW CONSOLIDATED
HEALTH CARE UNIT SECTION AT THE HALAWA
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY ON OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 28, 500 C c

7 . MAUI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER
RENOVATION, SECURITY UPGRADE, AND
OTHER IMPROVEMENTS, TO INCLUDE THE
MEDICAL AND MENTAL HEALTH AREAS, MAUI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATIONS,
REFURBISHMENTS, UPGRADES, INFRASTRUCTURE
WORK, AND NEW CONSTRUCTION FOR THE MAUI
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER; GROUND AND
SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 4,000 C c


HB300 CDl FIN 151

Page 152
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
8 . NEW OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL
CENTER FACILITY, OAHU

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR THE PROJECT MANAGEMENT
SUPPORT AND FINANCIAL PARTICIPATION BY
THE STATE OF HAWAII TO FUND AND CONSTRUCT
THE NEW OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL
CENTER (OCCC) FACILITY, OAHU.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 15, 000 C 15,000 C

9. WOMEN'S COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL
CENTER, KITCHEN EXPANSION, AND
RELATED INTERIM AND PERMANENT
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE EXPANSION,
MODERNIZATION, AND UPGRADE OF THE WOMEN'S
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER (WCCC)
KITCHEN SERVICES AND RELATED SUPPORT AND
EDUCATIONAL SERVICES, FACILITY-WIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING PSD 5, 000 C C

DEFllO - AMELIORATION OF PHYSICAL DISASTERS

10. FORT RUGER REPLACEMENT ELEVATOR, OAHU

CONSTRUCTION FOR A REPLACEMENT OF THE
ELEVATOR AT FORT RUGER, BUILDING 306A.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF 725 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 152

H B NO ’
' S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
DEF116 - HAWAII ARMY AND AIR NATIONAL GUARD

11. UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS TO HAWAII
ARMY NATIONAL GUARD FACILITIES,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR UPGRADES
AND IMPROVEMENTS TO FACILITIES SUPPORTING
UNIT STATIONING/RESTATIONING REQUIREMENTS
AND/OR FACILITATE COMPLIANCE WITH
FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL SAFETY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL REQUIREMENTS. IMPROVEMENTS
TO INCLUDE BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO
ADDITIONS, ALTERATIONS, AND/OR NEW
CONSTRUCTION. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING DEF 1,173C C
DEF 3,223P P

DEF118 - HAWAII EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY

12. RETROFIT PUBLIC BUILDINGS WITH
HURRICANE PROTECTIVE MEASURES,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT TO RETROFIT EXISTING BUILDINGS
AND/OR REINFORCE NEW BUILDINGS WITH
HURRICANE PROTECTIVE MEASURES TO INCREASE
THE NUMBER OF EMERGENCY SHELTERS
STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED
NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID
FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 1,500C 1,500C
AGS 1,500 P 1,500 P


■HB30■0 CD■l F■IN 153

Page 154 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
13. SIREN MAINTENANCE AND MODERNIZATION,
STATEWIDE

DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT
FOR UPGRADES AND MODERNIZATION OF
EXISTING OUTDOOR SIRENS TO PROVIDE PUBLIC
SAFETY ANNOUNCEMENT IN THE EVENT OF A
WARNING HAZARD, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 5, 000 C 5,000 C


HB300 GDI FIN 154
iiiiniiHiui

Page 155 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
' S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOP'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
K. GOVERNMENT-WIDE SUPPORT
BED144 - STATEWIDE PLANNING AND COORDINATION

1. EAST KAPOLEI TOD INFRASTRUCTURE, OAHU

PLANS FOR AN ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT
STATEMENT FOR THE EAST KAPOLEI TOD
DISTRICT.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 500 C C

2. STATE TRANSIT-ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT
(TOD) PLANNING, STATEWIDE

PLANS, FEASIBILITY AND COST STUDIES,
AND COORDINATION OF TOD PROJECTS, TOD
PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE REQUIREMENTS, AND
RELATED ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW DOCUMENTS
FOR TOD PROJECTS IN STATE TOD STRATEGIC
PLAN, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 2, 000 C C

3. WAIKIKI RESILIENCE AND SEA LEVEL RISE
ADAPTATION PROJECT, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR THE WAIKIKI
RESILIENCE AND SEA LEVEL RISE ADAPTATION
PROJECT.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 5,000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 155
l■lllln■llD

Page 156
H.B. NO. ?
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
AGS131 - ENTERPRISE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES

4. LUMP SUM HEALTH AND SAFETY, HAWAII
WIRELESS INTEROPERABILITY NETWORK,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR REPAIRS,
MODERNIZATION, AND EXPANSION OF CRITICAL
COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS, INCLUDING THE
STATEWIDE ANUENUE AND HAWAIIAN MICROWAVE
SYSTEMS AND LAND MOBILE RADIO, STATEWIDE
SHARED BLENDED RADIO SYSTEM, AND NEW
RADIO SITES AND TOWERS STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 4,000 C 2,000 C

LNRIOI - PUBLIC LANDS MANAGEMENT

5. CESSPOOL CLOSURES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
EPA CONSENT ORDER, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR CLOSURE OF LARGE CAPACITY
CESSPOOLS (LCC) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
CONSENT AGREEMENT AND FINAL ORDER (CA/FO)
WITH THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
AGENCY (EPA).
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1,500 B B

6. DEMOLITION OF EXISTING IMPROVEMENTS
AT 121 BANYAN DRIVE, HAWAII

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR DEMOLITION OF
121 BANYAN DRIVE, HILO, HAWAII.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1,200 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 156
IHHIIHIi

Page 157 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
7. EAST KAPOLEI TRANSIT ORIENTED
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR THE DEVELOPMENT
OF FOUR DLNR PARCELS ADJACENT TO AND
NEARBY THE KEONEAE RAIL STATION.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 500 B B

8. HALAI STREET PROPERTY, AUWAI
DRAINAGE, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO
REMOVE EXISTING CRM DITCH AND INSTALL A
60-INCH RCP CULVERT.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 1,455 C C

9 . LOWER KAPAHI RESERVOIR REMOVAL, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR BREACH OF LOWER
KAPAHI RESERVOIR TO COMPLY WITH DAM
SAFETY REGULATIONS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 500 B B

10. SHANGRI LA BREAKWATER REMOVAL, OAHU

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR DEMOLITION OF
STATE-OWNED STRUCTURE LOCATED IN THE
OCEAN SEAWARD OF THE SHANGRI LA MUSEUM.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 700 B B

11. STADIUM IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
TRACK AND FACILITY MAINTENANCE; REPAIR
AND UPGRADES TO STADIUM; TRACK LIGHTING;
SPECTATOR LIGHTING; EQUIPMENT
ACQUISITION.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR 700 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 157

Page 158
H.B. NO. S;
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
AGS221 - PUBLIC WORKS - PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION

12. LUMP SUM CIP - PROJECT ADJUSTMENT
FUND, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A
CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT
PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE
APPROPRIATIONS ACT.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 4 c 4 C

13. LUMP SUM MAINTENANCE OF EXISTING
FACILITIES, PWD, STATEWIDE

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN,
CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR
IMPROVEMENTS AND MAINTENANCE OF PUBLIC
FACILITIES AND SITES, STATEWIDE.
TOTAL FUNDING ' AGS 20,000 c C

14 . LUMP SUM STATE OFFICE BUILDING
REMODELING, STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR REMODELING AND UPGRADE OF
STATE-OWNED OFFICES TO ACCOMMODATE STATE
AGENCIES' OPERATIONAL REQUIREMENTS.
PROJECT INCLUDES RENOVATION FOR
REORGANIZATION, PROGRAM AND STAFFING
CHANGES, AND CONSOLIDATION, AS WELL AS
IMPROVEMENTS FOR OFFICE LAYOUTS, ENERGY
CONSERVATION, LIGHTING, A/C, VENTILATION,
PLUMBING, ELECTRICAL, AND
DATA/COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 2, 000 c C


HB300 CDl FIN 158

Page 159
H.B. NO. S.1
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOP'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
15. PLANNING FOR STATE CAPITOL BUILDING
REHABILITATION AND RELATED
IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS FOR THE TOTAL RENOVATION OF THE
STATE CAPITOL BUILDING AND TEMPORARY
ACCOMMODATION FOR OCCUPANTS AND
OPERATIONS. INCLUDES IDENTIFICATION AND
EVALUATION OF STATE AND PRIVATE SECTOR
OPTIONS WHICH COULD BE RENOVATED OR
REDEVELOPED TO TEMPORARILY RELOCATE
OCCUPANTS AND FUNCTIONS FROM THE STATE
CAPITOL BUILDING AND PLANNING FOR
SUBSEQUENT RE-USE OF ANY STATE ASSETS
THAT WERE UTILIZED.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 2, 000 C C

AGS901 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES

16. ENTERPRISE FINANCIAL SYSTEM,
STATEWIDE

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR THE STATE FINANCIAL SYSTEM.
TOTAL FUNDING AGS 35, 000 C C


HB300 CDl FIN 159
llllllliliillll

Page 160 300
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
SUB201 - CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU

17 . BOARD OF WATER SUPPLY - MONITORING
WELLS AT VARIOUS LOCATIONS, OAHU

PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
EQUIPMENT, AND APPURTENANCES FOR
GROUNDWATER MONITORING WELLS TO MEASURE
AND MONITOR THE LEVEL, QUALITY, QUANTITY,
OR MOVEMENT OF SUBSURFACE WATER, FOR
CONTAMINANTS WITH TOTAL PETROLEUM
HYDROCARBONS OR AQUEOUS FILM FORMING
FOAM, AND ALLOW FOR THE MONITORING OF
OTHER CONTAMINANTS RELATED TO THE RED
HILL FUEL CRISIS. PROVIDED THAT THE CITY
AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU CONTRIBUTES 80% OF
THE TOTAL PROJECT COST.
TOTAL FUNDING CCH 2,000 C c
CCH 8,000 S s

SUB301 - COUNTY OF HAWAII

18. KAWANANAKOA GYM RENOVATION, HAWAII

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
RENOVATIONS TO THE GYM; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES; PROVIDED THAT NO STATE
FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY
OF HAWAII CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY
FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-
DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COH 3,500 C c
COH 3,500 S s


HB300 GDI FIN 160
■■IIIIIIIMII

Page 161 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
SUB501 - COUNTY OF KAUAI

19. HANAPEPE STADIUM IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
HANAPEPE STADIUM INCLUDING LOCKER ROOMS
UPGRADES, LIGHT FIXTURES AND POLES,
CARETAKER OFFICE BUILDING REPLACEMENT,
AND ELECTRICAL ROOM UPGRADES; PROVIDED
THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED
UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES
MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON
A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COK 3,500 C c
COK 3,500 S s

20. KAUAI DEPARTMENT OF WATER, KUHIO
HIGHWAY WATER MAIN REPLACEMENT, KAUAI

CONSTRUCTION FOR REPLACEMENT OF 18-
INCH WATER MAIN ALONG KUHIO HIGHWAY
(HARDY TO OXFORD ST); PROVIDED THAT NO
STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE
COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES MATCHING
COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-
FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COK 1,500 C c
COK 1,500 S s


HB300 CDl FIN 161
linWIMBIIIOIII

Page 162 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
APPROPRIATIONS (IN OOO'S)
CAPITAL FISCAL M FISCAL M
ITEM PROJECT EXPENDING YEAR 0 YEAR 0
NO. NO. TITLE AGENCY 2025-2026 F 2026-2027 F
21. VIDINHA STADIUM IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI

PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR ADA UPGRADES, LIGHTING,
RENOVATE LOCKER ROOMS, RESTROOMS, OFFICE
SPACES, AND FOOD BOOTHS, REPLACE FENCING,
PAVING, AND PEDESTRIAN SAFETY; PROVIDED
THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED
UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES
MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON
A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COK 8,000C C
COK 8,000 S S



HB300 CDl FIN 162
MIIIMMIin

Page 163
H.B. NO. g i
C.D. 1
PART VI. CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROVISIONS
SECTION 15. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the
appropriations under Act 164, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023,
section 7, as amended and renumbered by Act 230, Session Laws of
Hawaii 2024, section 7, in the amounts indicated or balances
thereof, unallotted, allotted, unencumbered, or encumbered and
unrequired, are hereby lapsed:
"Item No. Amount. (MOF)
G-6 $ 500,000 C
G-9.3 671,000 C
G-14.3 660,000 C
G-15.3 1,000,000 C
G-24 2,500,000 C
G-25.1 350,000 C
G-36 21,000 C
G-46 6,000,000 C
G-52 2,500,000 C
G-53.2 100,000 C
G-54.1 2,000,000 C
G-61.1 1,000,000 C
G-64 130,000 C
G-70.1 500,000 C
G-78.2 4,000,000 C
G-79.2 150,000 C
G-86.1 1,000,000 C
G-92.1 650,000 C
G-98 200,000 C
G-99.2 1,320,000 C
G-111.2 650,000 C
G-112 3,000,000 C
G-112.1 200,000 C
G-113 1,500,000 C
G-113.2 1,680,000 C
G-113.3 1,000,000 C
G-119 100,000 C"
HB300 CDl FIN

Page 164
H.B. NO. g’
C.D. 1

SECTION 16. Part IV, section 7, of Act 164, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2023, as amended by section 7 of Act 230, Session Laws
of Hawaii 2024, is amended as follows:
1. By amending item A-17 to read:

"17. [PRESCHOOL EARLY EDUCATION,] TEACHER
HOUSING AND AFFORDABLE WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE, KIHEI, MAUI

PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN^ AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR REPURPOSING EXISTING
FACILITY FOR [PUBLIC PREKINDERCARTEN
CLASSROOMS,] DEDICATED TEACHER HOUSING
AND AFFORDABLE WORKFORCE HOUSING; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.
TOTAL FUNDING BED 45,000 C C"

2. By amending item C-21.1 to read:

"21.1 KAKAAKO ROAD IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
[RESURFAGJNC] IMPROVEMENTS TO ROADS IN
KAKAAKO[-], INCLUDING DRAINAGE, SIDEWALKS
& PATHS, UTILITY IMPROVEMENTS,
LANDSCAPING, LIGHTING, AND RELATED
AMENITIES.
TOTAL FUNDING TRN C 5,000 C"

3. By amending item D-ll.lto read:

"11.1 WEST MAUI AND UPCOUNTRY FIRE
PREVENTION AND EROSION CONTROL, MAUI

PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF
APPROXIMATELY 15 MILES OF FIREBREAKS,
REDUCTION OF FUELS, INSTALLATION OF WATER
TANKS OR SOURCES FOR FIRE-FIGHTING, AND
CONSTRUCTION OF EROSION.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR [©] C 2, 000 [B] C"

HB300 CDl FIN 164
MniHMIIII

Page 165
H.B. NO. g,
C.D. 1
4. By amending item D-11.2 to read:

"11.2 WEST MAUI AND UPCOUNTRY FIRE
SUPPRESSION DIP TANKS (6), MAUI"

PLANS, LAND, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION,
AND EQUIPMENT FOR INSTALLATION OF [^]
S^X 40,OOO-GALLON DIP TANKS FOR FIRE
SUPPRESSION IN WEST MAUI. IMPLEMENTS
PORTION OF THE WEST MAUI COMMUNITY
WILDFIRE ACTION PLAN
TOTAL FUNDING LNR [S] C 360 [©] C"

5. By amending item H-lO.l to read:

"10.1. ALA WAI SMALL BOAT HARBOR, OAHU

PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF
IMPROVEMENTS INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED
TO, FINGER PIERS, DOCKS, RESTROOM
FACILITIES, ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE,
SEWER AND GENERAL REPAIRS.
TOTAL FUNDING LNR C 3,000 C"

6. By amending item K-21 to read:

"21. KAUAI DEPARTMENT OF WATER REVISED
ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW PROJECT, KAUAI

PLANS AND DESIGN FOR AN ENVIRONMENTAL
REVIEW DOCUMENT TO RE-EVALUATE AND ALLOW
THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE DOW'S WATER PLAN
2020 NO. PLH-35B CONSTRUCT KAPAIA CANE
HAUL ROAD 18-INCH MAIN PROJECT.
PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE
EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI
CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR
STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS.
TOTAL FUNDING COK 375 C C
COK 375 S S"

SECTION 17. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO), the sum
of $71,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
HB300 CDl FIN 165

Page 166
H.B. NO. |
h i
C.D. 1
year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement projects and
deferred maintenance projects with the following projects given
priority; provided further that the department of education
shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this
appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December
1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days
prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027:
1. AINA HAINA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION
FOR PAVING THE MAUKA LOT OUTSIDE OF THE BACK CATTLE GATE FOR PARKING,
FENCE SURROUNDING PARKING LOT AND CAMPUS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

2. CASTLE HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE INCLUDING REROOFING PORTABLES 1-10 AND GUTTER REPLACEMENT
CAMPUS-WIDE; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

3. CASTLE HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR RONALD E.
BRIGHT PERFORMING ARTS CENTER SEATING, LIGHTING REPLACEMENT, AND OTHER
IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

4. HONOKAA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL AND HONOKAA HIGH AND INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL,
HAWAII; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CAFETERIA REFRIGERATION SYSTEMS
REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

5. JARRETT MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PARKING LOT
IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

6. KAEWAI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PARKING
LOT IMPROVEMENTS AND EXPANSION; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES;

7. KAIMUKI HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE INCLUDING AUDITORIUM REROOFING AND L BUILDING SEWER LINE
RELOCATION; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

8. KAIMUKI MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE
REPLACEMENT OF WATER PIPING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;

HB300 CDl FIN 166
iniMiiiiiBn

Page 167 300
H.B. NO
H,D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
9. KALIHI KAI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU;,DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR F
BUILDING ROOF REPAIRS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

10. KE KULA KAIAPUNI 0 ANUENUE, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A
BUILDING FIRST AND SECOND FLOOR RRM; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCE;

11. KEALAKEHE HIGH SCHOOL, HAWAII; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DEFERRED
MAINTENANCE INCLUDING V BUILDING AC REPLACEMENT, EXTERIOR REPAINTING
FOR A, BB, D, E, F, I, J, AND Q BUILDINGS, AND INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR
PAINTING FOR SBBH BUILDING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

12. KING INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO ADDRESS
DEFERRED MAINTENANCE INCLUDING D BUILDING ELECTRICAL UPGRADES, F
BUILDING STRUCTURAL EVALUATION, CAMPUS WALKWAY AND SPALLING REPAIRS, K
BUILDING WATERPROOFING UPPER WALLS, C BUILDING WATER LINE REPLACEMENT,
FIELD MAINTENANCE/RESODDING, AND A BUILDING EROSION CONTROL
IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

13. MOANALUA MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR PLANNED CAMPUS-WIDE ELECTRICAL UPGRADES; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

14. PALOLO ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CAMPUS
REPAINTING EXTERIOR; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

15. PRESIDENT ABRAHAM LINCOLN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION FOR INSTALLATION OF A FENCE TO SECURE THE WEST SIDE OF THE
CAMPUS; EXTEND THE FENCE LINKING TO THE EXISTING FENCE; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

16. RADFORD HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PARKING LOT
IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

17. WAIAKEA INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, HAWAII; GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND
FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

18. WAIKIKI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO ADDRESS
BUILDING G GROUND SETTLEMENT ISSUES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;

19. WAILUKU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI; PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION
FOR PARKING LOT IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
TiND APPURTENANCES;

HB300 CDl FIN 167

Page 168 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
20. WAIPAHU INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
GENERAL REPAIRS FOR WATER MAIN; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT
AND APPURTENANCES; AND

21. WAIPAHU INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
CAFETERIA HEAT ABATEMENT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES.

SECTION 18. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO), the sum
of $40,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement projects and
health and safety projects with the following projects given
priority; provided further that the department of education
shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this
appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December
1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days
prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027:
1. KAHALUU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR FIRE
ALARM UPGRADES INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

2. KALAKAUA MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR FIRE ALARM
UPGRADES INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

3. KANEOHE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
REPLACEMENT OF FIRE ALARM SYSTEM INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND
AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

4. NANAKULI HIGH AND INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION
FOR REPLACEMENT OF CAMPUS FIRE ALARM SYSTEM INCLUDING SYSTEM
MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;
AND

HB300 CDl FIN 168
niniiiiNiii

Page 169
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
5. PUUHALE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR FIRE
ALARM UPGRADES INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.

SECTION 19. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO), the sum
of $18,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement projects and
support projects with the following projects given priority;
provided further that the department of education shall submit a
summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the
previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to
the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening
of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027:
1. AIEA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR VISITOR
BLEACHERS, DRAINAGE, AND ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS AT THE ATHLETIC STADIUM;
GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

2. HILO HIGH SCHOOL, HAWAII; PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR
BLEACHERS FOR THE FOOTBALL FIELD/TRACK; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

3. KAILUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR TRACK AND
FIELD IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

4. KILAUEA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, KAUAI; DESIGN FOR A COVERED PLAY COURT;

5. KUHIO ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A COVERED
WALKWAY/RAMP AND ACCESSIBLE ROUTE IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

6. WAIMEA HIGH SCHOOL, KAUAI; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR GYMNASIUM
RELATED FACILITIES AND IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS,
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES;

HB300 CDl FIN 169
IIIIIIIIHIIi

Page 170 300
H.B. NO
H.D, 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
7. WAIPAHU HIGH SCHOOL SOFTBALL FIELD IMPROVEMENTS - PHASE 2, OAHU;
DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE WAIPAHU HIGH SCHOOL
SOFTBALL FIELD; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

8. WAIPAHU INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR NEW COVERED ATHLETIC COURT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS;
EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; AND

9. WEBLING ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A NEW MAIN
OFFICE OR EXPANSION TO THE EXISTING OFFICE.

SECTION 20. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO), the sum
of $16,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement projects and
compliance projects with the following projects given priority;
provided further that the department of education shall submit a
summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the
previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to
the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening
of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027:
1. MOANALUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS AND DESIGN OF GIRLS ATHLETIC
LOCKER ROOM, WEIGHT ROOM, AND OTHER FACILITIES;

2. RADFORD HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR
SOFTBALL IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES;

3. ROOSEVELT HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE GIRLS
ATHLETIC LOCKER ROOM; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND
APPURTENANCES; AND

4. WAIANAE HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND
EQUIPMENT FOR SOFTBALL FIELD IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE
IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES.
HB300 CDl FIN 170
■iHiiiimi

Page 171
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1

SECTION 21. Provided that of the general obligation bond
fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDNIOO), the sum
of $50,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement project
completion; provided further that the department of education
shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this
appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December
1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days
prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027.
SECTION 22. Provided that of the general obligation bond
funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund
for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $56,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii
public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi development Mayor Wright
Homes project on Oahu; provided further that if construction
does not commence by August 31, 2026, the deposited funds may be
utilized for other affordable housing projects of the Hawaii
housing finance and development corporation; and provided
further that the construction commencement date may be extended
HB300 CDl FIN
iiniiiiiHiin

Page 172
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
with the approval of the Hawaii housing finance and development
corporation's board of directors and the governor.
SECTION 23. Provided that of the general obligation bond
funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund
for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $3,050,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii
public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi predevelopment Kaahumanu
Homes project on Oahu.
SECTION 24. Provided that of the general obligation bond
funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund
for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $4,000,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii
public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi predevelopment Kapaa
Homes project on Kauai.
SECTION 25. Provided that of the general obligation bond
funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund
for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $4,200,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii
HB300 CDl FIN 172
■imiiiiii

Page 173
H.B. NO. S.1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi predevelopment Lanakila
Homes project on Hawaii.
SECTION 26. Provided that of the general obligation bond
funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and
development corporation's (BEDI60) rental housing revolving fund
for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $750,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii
public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi predevelopment Nanakuli
Homes project on Oahu.
SECTION 27. Provided that the general fund and general
obligation bond fund appropriations for Maui Health System, a
KFH LLC (HTH214), for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 shall be
disbursed by the Hawaii health systems corporation to the Maui
Health System, a Kaiser Foundation Hospitals LLC, for its
capital subsidies in the respective fiscal years; provided
further that the Maui Health System has satisfied all of the
standards and conditions of section 323F-58, Hawaii Revised
Statutes.
SECTION 28. Provided that of the general obligation bond
funds and revenue bond funds for UHM Student Housing Services
Improvements (UOHIOO), the sums of $30,750,000 out of general
HB300 CDl FIN 173
INIIIMHIliin

Page 174
H.B. NO. S
j
C.D. 1
obligation bond funds, and $30,750,000 out of revenue bond
funds, or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2025-2026, and the sums of $28,500,000 out of general obligation
bond funds and $28,500,000 out of revenue bond funds, or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027, shall be
used for planning, design, construction, equipment, and
furnishing of improvements for university of Hawaii at Manoa
student housing services facilities and pedestrian pathways;
provided further that students residing in the university of
Hawaii student housing services program with a demonstrated
financial need, as determined by the university of Hawaii, who
qualify for the resident tuition fee pursuant to section 304A-
402, Hawaii Revised Statutes, are assisted with a housing
allowance, stipend, or similar financial aid to help offset a
portion of an increase in room and board costs that are due to
increased debt service from said revenue bonds; and provided
further that any unexpended and unencumbered balance of the
appropriation shall not lapse at the end of fiscal year 2026-
2027 and shall lapse instead on June 30, 2030.

HB300 GDI FIN 174

Page 175 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1

PART VII. ISSUANCE OF BONDS
SECTION 29. AIRPORT REVENUE BONDS. The department of
transportation is authorized to issue airport revenue bonds for
airport capital improvement program projects authorized in part
II and listed in part V of this Act and designated to be
financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond
funds with debt service costs to be paid from special funds, in
such principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts
appropriated for such capital improvement program projects, and,
if so determined by the department and approved by the governor,
any additional principal amount as may be necessary by the
department to pay interest on such airport revenue bonds during
the estimated period of construction of the capital improvement
program project for which such airport revenue bonds are issued,
to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for the airport
revenue bonds and to pay the expenses of issuance of such bonds.
The airport revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the
provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
as the same may be amended from time to time. The principal of
and interest on airport revenue bonds, to the extent not paid
HB300 GDI FIN 175
liiniHiiiBii

Page 176
H.B. NO. S-i
C.D. 1
from the proceeds of such bonds, shall be payable solely from
and secured solely by the revenues from airports and related
facilities under the ownership of the State or operated and
managed by the department and the aviation fuel taxes levied and
paid pursuant to sections 243-4(a)(2) and 248-8, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, or such parts of either thereof as the department may
determine, including rents, landing fees, and other fees or
charges presently or hereafter derived from or arising through
the ownership, operation, and management of airports and related
facilities and the furnishing and supplying of the services
thereof, and passenger facility charges pursuant to section 261-
5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as amended, and as determined by
the department. The expenses of the issuance of such airport
revenue bonds shall, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of
such bonds, be paid from the airport revenue fund and passenger
facility charge special fund as determined by the department.
The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized
to use the airport revenue fund and passenger facility charge
special fund to finance those projects authorized in part II and
listed in part V of this Act where the method of financing is
designated to be by airport revenue bond funds.
HB300 GDI FIN 176

Page 177
H.B. NO. g;
C.D. 1
SECTION 30. RENTAL MOTOR VEHICLE CUSTOMER FACILITY REVENUE
BONDS. The department of transportation is authorized to issue
rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds for airport
capital improvement program projects relating to consolidated
rental car facilities authorized in part II and listed in part V
of this Act and designated to be financed by revenue bond funds
with debt service cost to be paid from rental motor vehicle
customer facility charge special funds, as authorized by section
261-5.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in such principal amount as
shall be required to yield the amounts appropriated for such
capital improvement program projects, and, if so determined by
the department and approved by the governor, any additional
principal amount as may be necessary by the department to pay
interest on the rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue
bonds during the estimated period of construction of the capital
improvement program project for which the rental motor vehicle
customer facility revenue bonds are issued, to establish,
maintain, or increase reserves for the rental motor vehicle
customer facility revenue bonds and to pay the expenses of
issuance of the bonds. The rental motor vehicle customer
facility revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the
HB300 GDI FIN 177
iniiiiiimiH

Page 178 ■ ■ ik ■ 300
H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
as the same may be amended from time to time. The principal of
and interest on rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue
bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds,
shall be payable solely from and secured solely by the revenues
from the rental motor vehicle surcharge tax and the rental motor
vehicle customer facility charge special fund pursuant to
section 261-5.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as amended, and as
determined by the department. The expenses of the issuance of
such rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds, to
the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds shall be
paid from the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge
special fund as determined by the department.
The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized
to use the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special
fund to finance those projects authorized in part II and listed
in part V of this Act where the method of financing is
designated to be by rental motor vehicle customer facility
revenue bond funds.
SECTION 31. HARBOR REVENUE BONDS. The department of
transportation is authorized to issue harbor revenue bonds for
HB300 GDI FIN 17?
■■IIIIIHIIIO

Page 179
H.B. NO. ^.1
C.D. 1
harbor capital improvement program projects authorized in part
II and listed in part V of this Act and designated to be
financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond
funds with debt service cost to be paid from special funds, in
such principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts
appropriated for such capital improvement program projects, and,
if so determined by the department and approved by the governor,
such additional amounts as may be deemed necessary by the
department to pay interest on such revenue bonds during the
estimated construction period of the capital improvement project
for which such harbor revenue bonds are issued to establish,
maintain, or increase reserves for the harbor revenue bonds or
harbor revenue bonds heretofore authorized (whether authorized
and issued or authorized and still unissued), and to pay the
expenses of issuance of such bonds. The aforementioned harbor
revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of part
III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as the same may be
amended from time to time. The principal of and interest on
harbor revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds
of such bonds, shall be payable solely from and secured solely
by the revenues derived from harbors and related facilities
HB300 CDl FIN 179
■IIEMIIIIMIO

Page 180 ■H ■ .B. k N I O. ;
hb
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
under the ownership of the State or operated and managed by the
department, including rents, mooring, wharfage, dockage,
pilotage fees, and other fees or charges presently or hereafter
derived from or arising through the ownership, operation, and
management of harbor and related facilities and the furnishing
and supplying of the services thereof. The expenses of the
issuance of such harbor revenue bonds shall, to the extent not
paid from the proceeds of such bonds, be paid from the harbor
special fund.
The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized
to use the harbor revenue fund to finance those projects
authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act where the
method of financing is designated to be by harbor revenue bond
funds.
SECTION 32. HIGHWAY REVENUE BONDS. The department of
transportation is authorized to issue highway revenue bonds for
highway capital improvement program projects authorized in part
II and listed in part V of this Act and designated to be
financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond
funds with the debt service cost to be paid from special funds,
in such principal amount as shall be required to yield the
HB300 CDl FIN 18'
llllllliillll

Page 181
H.B. NO. gj
C.D. 1
amounts appropriated for such capital improvement projects, and,
if so determined by the department and approved by the governor,
such additional principal amount as may be deemed necessary by
the department to pay interest on such highway revenue bonds
during the estimated period of construction of the capital
improvement project for which such highway revenue bonds are
issued, to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for such
highway revenue bonds or highway revenue bonds heretofore
authorized (whether authorized and issued or authorized and
still unissued), and to pay all or any part of the expenses
related to the issuance of such highway revenue bonds. The
aforementioned highway revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to
the provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, as the same may be amended from time to time. The
principal of and interest on such highway revenue bonds, to the
extent not paid from the proceeds of such highway revenue bonds,
shall be payable from and secured by the revenues derived from
highways and related facilities under the ownership of the State
or operated and managed by the department, from the highway fuel
taxes, vehicle weight taxes, and vehicle registration fees,
levied and paid pursuant to sections 243-4, 248-8, 249-31, and
HB300 GDI FIN 181

H B NO
C.D. 1
249-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and federal moneys received by
the State or any department thereof which are available to pay
principal of or interest on indebtedness of the State, or such
part of any thereof as the department may determine, and other
user taxes, fees or charges currently or hereafter derived from
or arising through the ownership, operation, and management of
highways and related facilities and the furnishing and supplying
of the services thereof. The expenses related to the issuance
of such highway revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the
proceeds of such bonds, shall be paid from the state highway
fund.
The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized
to use the state highway fund to finance those projects
authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act where the
method of financing is designated to be by highway revenue bond
funds; provided that the governor shall submit a report of all
uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from
December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than
thirty days prior to the convening of regular sessions of 2026
and 2027.

HB300 GDI FIN 182

Page 183
H.B. NO. gj
C.D. 1

PART VIII. SPECIAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 33. GOVERNOR'S DISCRETIONARY POWERS. Any law or
provision to the contrary notwithstanding, the governor may
replace general obligation bond funds appropriated for capital
improvement projects with general obligation reimbursable bond
funds, when the expenditure of such general obligation
reimbursable bond funds is deemed appropriate for the project.
SECTION 34. All general obligation bond funds used for a
public undertaking, improvement, or system designated by the
letter (D) shall have the bond principal and interest reimbursed
from the special fund in which the net revenue, or net user tax
receipts, or combination of both, of such public undertaking,
improvement, or system are deposited or credited. Bonds issued
for irrigation and housing projects shall be reimbursed as
provided by section 174-21 and chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, respectively.
The governor is authorized to use, at the governor's
discretion, the state highway fund, the harbor special fund, the
boating special fund, the airport revenue fund, the special land
and development fund, or other appropriate special funds to
HB300 CDl FIN 183
IHlMllinUIII

Page 184
H.B. NO. S-j
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
finance the respective public undertaking, improvement, or
system described above and authorized in this Act, where the
method of financing is designated to be general obligation bond
fund with debt service cost to be paid from the funds.
SECTION 35. The governor may supplement funds for any cost
element for a capital improvement project authorized under this
Act by transferring sums as may be needed from the funds
appropriated for other cost elements of the same project by this
Act or any other prior or future act that has not lapsed;
provided that the total expenditure of funds for all cost
elements shall not exceed the total appropriations for that
project.
SECTION 36. If the authorized appropriations specified for
a capital improvement project listed in this Act are
insufficient and where the source of funding is designated as
airport passenger facility charge funds, the governor may make
supplemental allotments from the airport revenue fund or airport
revenue bond funds, or transfer unreguired balances from other
unlapsed projects in this Act or prior appropriation acts that
authorized the use of airport passenger facility charge funds;
provided further that the supplemental allotments shall not be
HB300 CDl FIN 184
IBaillllMIIIN

Page 185
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
used to increase the scope of the project; provided further that
the supplemental allotments shall not impair the ability of the
fund to meet the purposes for which it was established; and
provided further that the governor, at the governor's
discretion, is authorized to increase the passenger facility
charge fund authorization ceiling for the program to accommodate
the expenditure of those funds.
SECTION 37. In the event that the authorized appropriations
specified for a capital improvement project for the department
of transportation listed in this Act are insufficient and where
the source of funding is designated as special funds, general
obligation bond fund with debt service cost to be paid from
special funds, revenue bond funds, or revolving funds, the
governor may make supplemental allotments from the special fund
or revolving fund responsible for cash or debt service payments
for the projects, or transfer unrequired balances from other
unlapsed projects in this Act or prior appropriation acts that
authorized the use of special funds, general obligation bond
fund with debt service costs to be paid from special funds,
revenue bond funds, or revolving funds; provided that such
supplemental allotments shall not be used to increase the scope
HB300 CDl FIN 185

Page 186
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
of the project; and provided further that such supplemental
allotments shall not impair the ability of the fund to meet the
purposes for which it was established; and provided further that
the governor shall submit a report of all uses of this authority
for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November
30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the
convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027.
SECTION 38. After the objectives and purposes of
appropriations made in this Act from the general obligation bond
fund for capital improvement projects for the university of
Hawaii have been met, unrequired balances shall be transferred
to the university of Hawaii project adjustment fund appropriated
in part II and described in part V of this Act, and shall be
considered a supplementary appropriation thereto; provided that
all other unrequired allotment balances, unrequired
appropriation balances, and unrequired encumbrance balances
shall lapse as of June 30, 2028, as provided in section 44 of
this Act.
SECTION 39. If authorized appropriations specified for
university of Hawaii capital improvement projects listed in this
Act or in any other act currently authorized by the legislature
HB300 CDl FIN 186

Page 187 300
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
are insufficient, and where the source of funding for the
project is designated as the general obligation bond fund, the
governor may make supplemental allotments from the university of
Hawaii project adjustment fund appropriated in part II and
described in part V of this Act to supplement any currently
authorized capital investment project cost elements for the
university of Hawaii; provided that such supplemental allotments
from the project adjustment fund shall not be used to increase
the scope of the project; and provided further that the governor
shall submit a report of all uses of this authority for the
previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to
the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening
of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027.
SECTION 40. After the objectives and purposes of
appropriations made in this Act from the general obligation bond
fund for capital improvement projects for the department of
accounting and general services, including any project the
department of accounting and general services has been
designated as the expending agency for, have been met,
unrequired balances shall be transferred to the department of
accounting and general services project adjustment fund
HB300 CDl FIN 187
HHliimiMIIIII

Page 188
H.B. NO. S,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
appropriated in part II and described in part V of this Act, and
shall be considered a supplementary appropriation thereto;
provided that all other unrequired allotment balances,
unrequired appropriation balances, and unrequired encumbrance
balances shall lapse as of June 30, 2028, as provided in section
44 of this Act.
SECTION 41. If authorized appropriations specified for
department of accounting and general services capital
improvement projects, including any project the department of
accounting and general services has been designated as the
expending agency for, listed in this Act or in any other act
currently authorized by the legislature are insufficient, and
where the source of funding for the project is designated as the
general obligation bond fund, the governor may make supplemental
allotments from the department of accounting and general
services project adjustment fund appropriated in part II and
described in part V of this Act to supplement any currently
authorized capital investment project cost elements for the
department of accounting and general services; provided that
such supplemental allotments from the project adjustment fund
shall not be used to increase the scope of the project; and
HB300 CDl FIN 188
IIMIIMIBIIM

Page 189
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
provided further that the governor shall submit a report of all
uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from
December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than
thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of
2026 and 2027.
SECTION 42. After the objectives and purposes of
appropriations made in this Act from the revenue bond fund for
capital improvement projects for the department of
transportation airports division have been met, unrequired
balances shall be transferred to the airports project adjustment
fund appropriated in part II and described in part V of this
Act, and shall be considered a supplementary appropriation
thereto; provided that all other unrequired allotment balances,
unrequired appropriation balances, and unrequired encumbrance
balances shall lapse as of June 30, 2028, as provided in section
44 of this Act.
SECTION 43. If authorized appropriations specified for
department of transportation airports division capital
improvement projects listed in this Act or in any other act
currently authorized by the legislature are insufficient, and
where the source of funding for the project is designated as the
HB300 CDl FIN 189
■■lllllllllil

Page 190
H.B. NO. g]
C.D. 1
revenue bond fund, the governor may make supplemental allotments
from the airports project adjustment fund appropriated in part
II and described in part V of this Act to supplement any
currently authorized capital investment cost elements for the
department of transportation airports division; provided that
such supplemental allotments from the project adjustment fund
shall not be used to increase the scope of the project; and
provided further that the governor shall submit a report of all
uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from
December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than
thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of
2026 and 2027.
SECTION 44. Any provision of this Act to the contrary
notwithstanding, the appropriations made for capital improvement
projects authorized under this Act shall not lapse at the end of
the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made;
provided that all appropriations made to be expended in fiscal
biennium 2025-2027 that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028,
shall lapse as of that date; provided further that this lapsing
date shall not apply to non-general fund appropriations for
projects described in part V of this Act where such
HB300 CDl FIN 190
INIIIMIIIIIIIII

Page 191
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
appropriations have been deemed necessary to qualify for federal
aid financing and reimbursement and are unencumbered as of June
30, 2032, shall lapse as of that date.
SECTION 45. In releasing funds for capital improvement
projects, the governor shall consider legislative intent and the
objectives of the user agency and its programs; the scope and
level of the user agency's intended service; and the means,
efficiency, and economics by which the project will meet the
objectives of the user agency and the State; provided further
that agencies responsible for construction shall take into
consideration legislative intent, the objectives of the user
agency and its programs, and the scope and level of the user
agency's intended service and construct the improvement to meet
the objectives of the user agency in the most efficient and
economical manner possible.
SECTION 46. With the approval of the governor, designated
expending agencies for capital improvement projects authorized
in this Act may delegate to other state or county agencies the
implementation of projects when it is determined advantageous to
do so by both the original expending agency and the agency to
which expending authority is to be delegated.
HB300 CDl FIN 19j
■iiniiiiiiii

Page 192
H.B. NO. S,
h
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 47. Where county capital improvement projects are
partially or totally funded by state grants as authorized in
this Act or any other act of the legislature, this fact should
be appropriately acknowledged during construction and upon
completion of these projects.
SECTION 48. Whenever the expending agency to which an
appropriation is made is changed due to legislation enacted
during any session of the legislature that affects the
appropriations made by this Act, the governor shall transfer the
necessary funds and positions to the proper expending agency as
provided by law.
SECTION 49. If unanticipated federal funding cutbacks
diminish or curtail essential, federally-funded state programs,
the governor may utilize savings as determined to be available
from other state programs for the purpose of maintaining such
programs until the next legislative session; provided that the
governor shall submit a report of all uses of this authority for
the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30
to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the
convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027.
HB300 CDl FIN 192
imiiiniiiiiiiH

Page 193
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 50. With the approval of the governor, agencies
that use appropriations authorized in part II of this Act for
audit services may delegate that responsibility and transfer
funds to the internal post audit program (AGS104), when it is
determined by such agencies that it is advantageous to do so.
SECTION 51. Agencies with appropriations authorized in
part II of this Act for risk management costs shall transfer
funds authorized for that purpose to the state risk management
and insurance division (AGS203) for the administration and
implementation of state risk management costs and expenses,
except as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 52. With the approval of the governor, the Hawaii
health systems corporation in the department of health may
transfer to the department of human services funds appropriated
to the Hawaii health systems corporation for the care and
treatment of patients, whenever the department of human services
can utilize such funds to match federal funds that may be
available to help finance the cost of outpatient, acute
hospital, or long-term care of indigents or medical indigents in
designated critical access hospitals.
HB300 CDl FIN 193

Page 194
H.B. NO. J
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 53, With the approval of the governor, the
department of health may transfer to the department of human
. 3 services funds appropriated to the department of health for the
care and treatment of patients, whenever the department of human
services can utilize such funds to match federal funds to
finance the cost of outpatient, hospital, or skilled nursing
home care of indigents or medical indigents.
SECTION 54. The department of human services may enter
into agreements with the department of health to furnish
outpatient, hospital, and skilled nursing home care of indigents
or medical indigents and to pay the department of health for
such care; provided that with the approval of the director of
finance, the department of health may deposit part of such
receipts into the appropriations from which transfers were made
as provided elsewhere in this Act.
PART IX. MISCELLANEOUS AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 55. If any portion of this Act or its application
to any person, entity, or circumstance is held to be invalid for
any reason, then the legislature declares that the remainder of
this Act and each and every other provision of this Act shall
not be affected thereby. If any portion of a specific
HB300 CDl FIN 194

Page 195 H.B. NO. g’
C.D. 1
appropriation is held to be invalid for any reason, the
remaining portion shall be expended to fulfill the objective of
such appropriation to the extent possible.
SECTION 56. In the event manifest clerical, typographical,
or other mechanical errors are found in this Act, the governor
is hereby authorized to correct such errors.
SECTION 57. Material to be repealed is bracketed and
stricken. ■ New material in prior enacted laws is underscored.
SECTION 58. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
HB300 CDl FIN 195
MIBHillllll

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this day of , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 300, HD1,SD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 300, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate